Nebraska, session 109, LB331.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 57 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Nebraska EPIC Option Consumption Tax Act, where the acronym
EPIC stands for the elimination of property, income, and corporate taxes.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Nebraska EPIC Option Consumption Tax
Act:
(1) Affiliated firms means two or more firms that are affiliated
with each other. A firm is affiliated with another if one firm owns fifty
percent or more of:
(a) The voting shares in a corporation; or
(b) The capital interests of a business firm that is not a
corporation;
(2) Consumption tax means the tax imposed pursuant to the Nebraska
EPIC Option Consumption Tax Act;
(3) Designated commercial private courier service means a firm
designated as such by the Tax Commissioner, upon application by the firm,
if the firm:
(a) Provides its services to the general public; and
(b) Records electronically to its database kept in the regular
course of its business the date on which an item was given to such firm
for delivery;
(4) Education and training means tuition for primary, secondary, or
postsecondary level education and job-related training courses. Such term
does not include room, board, sports activities, recreational activities,
hobbies, games, arts or crafts, or cultural activities;
(5) Groceries means food items purchased for personal human
consumption;
(6) Gross payments means payments for taxable property or services,
including taxes imposed in the Nebraska EPIC Option Consumption Tax Act;
(7)(a) Intangible property includes copyrights, trademarks, patents,
goodwill, financial instruments, securities, commercial paper, debts,
notes and bonds, and other property deemed intangible by common law.
-2-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
(b) Intangible property does not include tangible personal property
or rents or leaseholds of any term thereon, real property or rents or
leaseholds of any term thereon, or computer software;
(8) Person means any individual, association, estate, trust,
partnership, corporation, or other entity of any kind;
(9)(a) Produce, provide, render, or sell taxable property or
services shall have the following meaning: A taxable property or service
is something used to produce, provide, render, or sell a taxable property
or service if such property or service is purchased by a person engaged
in a trade or business for the purpose of employing or using such taxable
property or service in the production, provision, rendering, or sale of
other taxable property or services in the ordinary course of that trade
or business.
(b) Taxable property or services used in a trade or business for the
purposes of research, experimentation, testing, and development shall be
treated as used to produce, provide, render, or sell taxable property or
services.
(c) Taxable property or services purchased by an insurer on behalf
of an insured shall be treated as used to produce, provide, render, or
sell taxable property or services if the premium for the insurance
contract giving rise to the insurer's obligation was subject to tax
pursuant to section 27 of this act.
(d) Education and training shall be treated as services used to
produce, provide, render, or sell taxable property or services;
(10) Registered seller means a person registered pursuant to section
11 of this act;
(11) Responsible officers and partners means:
(a) In the case of a corporation, any officer who is the president,
the chief executive officer, a vice president, the secretary, the
treasurer, or the chief financial officer or who serves a similar
function for the corporation;
-3-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
(b) In the case of a partnership, any partner other than limited
partners; or
(c) In the case of a limited liability company, any officer serving
the function of a corporate president or chief executive officer,
treasurer or chief financial officer, or secretary and any member
actively engaged in the management of the company;
(12) Tax Commissioner means the Tax Commissioner of the State of
Nebraska;
(13) Tax inclusive fair market value means the fair market value of
taxable property or services plus the tax imposed by the Nebraska EPIC
Option Consumption Tax Act;
(14) Taxable employer includes:
(a) Any household employing domestic servants; and
(b) Any government except for government enterprises as defined in
section 25 of this act;
(15)(a) Taxable property or service means:
(i) Any property, including leaseholds of any term or rents with
respect to such property, but excluding:
(A) Intangible property; and
(B) Used property; and
(ii) Any service, including any financial intermediation services as
defined in section 27 of this act.
(b) For purposes of subdivision (15)(a) of this section, the term
service:
(i) Shall include any service performed by an employee for which the
employee is paid wages or a salary by a taxable employer; and
(ii) Shall not include any service performed by an employee for
which the employee is paid wages or a salary:
(A) By an employer in the regular course of the employer's trade or
business;
(B) By an employer that is a not-for-profit organization as defined
-4-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
in section 26 of this act;
(C) By an employer that is a government enterprise as defined in
section 25 of this act; or
(D) By taxable employers to employees directly providing education
and training;
(16) Used property means:
(a) Property on which the tax imposed by the Nebraska EPIC Option
Consumption Tax Act has already been collected and for which no credit
has been allowed;
(b) Property that was held other than for a business purpose in a
trade or business as defined in subdivision (2)(b) of section 8 of this
act, on December 31, 2027;
(c) Property that a business has been using but intends to dispose
of; or
(d) Property owned by a private citizen prior to January 1, 2028;
and
(17) Wage or salary means all compensation paid for employment
service, including cash compensation, employee benefits, disability
insurance, wage replacement insurance payments, unemployment compensation
insurance, workers' compensation insurance, and the fair market value of
any other consideration paid by an employer to an employee in
consideration for employment services rendered.
Sec. 3. (1) The state income tax imposed pursuant to the Nebraska
Revenue Act of 1967 is hereby repealed effective at the end of the day on
December 31, 2027. The Department of Revenue may collect taxes due from
2027 during calendar year 2028, but income earned in 2028 shall not be
subject to the income tax.
(2) The state sales and use taxes imposed pursuant to the Nebraska
Revenue Act of 1967 and all local sales and use taxes imposed pursuant to
the Local Option Revenue Act, the Qualified Judgment Payment Act, and
sections 13-319 and 13-2813 are hereby repealed effective at the end of
-5-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
the day on December 31, 2027. The Department of Revenue may collect sales
and use taxes due from 2027 during calendar year 2028, but no sales and
use taxes shall be imposed on purchases of goods and services beginning
January 1, 2028.
Sec. 4. (1) The property tax imposed pursuant to Chapter 77 is
hereby repealed effective at the end of the day on December 31, 2027.
Property taxes due from 2027 may be collected during calendar year 2028,
but no property taxes shall be imposed on real or personal property
beginning January 1, 2028.
(2) The motor vehicle tax imposed in section 60-3,185 and the motor
vehicle fee imposed in section 60-3,190 are hereby repealed effective at
the end of the day on December 31, 2027. Such taxes and fees due from
2027 may be collected during calendar year 2028, but no such taxes or
fees shall be imposed beginning January 1, 2028.
Sec. 5. The inheritance tax imposed pursuant to sections 77-2001 to
77-2040 is hereby repealed effective at the end of the day on December
31, 2027. Inheritance taxes due from 2027 may be collected during
calendar year 2028, but no inheritance taxes shall be imposed on a
deceased person's estate beginning January 1, 2028.
Sec. 6. This section establishes the Nebraska Taxpayer's Bill of
Rights, which shall apply beginning January 1, 2028, and shall include
the following:
(1) The citizens of Nebraska are entitled to a fair and just tax
system, one which favors neither the poor nor the rich, neither rural
dwellers nor urban dwellers, neither business owners nor laborers, and
that is no respecter of race, religion, creed, or sex;
(2) The State of Nebraska shall never impose or collect a tax on the
income of its citizens, whether such income tax be of a personal nature
or of a corporate nature;
(3) The State of Nebraska shall never impose a tax on the property
already owned by its citizens, regardless of whether such property is
-6-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
real or personal, tangible or intangible;
(4) The State of Nebraska shall never impose a tax on the estate of
a deceased person or the inheritance of the heirs of a deceased person;
(5) Because the consumption tax manifests a security against
government excess, it shall be preferred above all other tax systems in
the State of Nebraska;
(6) The Department of Revenue shall be subject to the citizens of
the State of Nebraska by readily correcting errors of taxation and
granting temporary relief to registered sellers suffering hardship due to
the burden of remitting taxes;
(7) No service or new good shall ever be subjected to more than one
kind of tax and no additional excise taxes shall be imposed by the State
of Nebraska or any political subdivision thereof beyond those described
in section 8 of this act;
(8) The State of Nebraska and any political subdivision thereof
shall be strictly prohibited from imposing a tax on groceries purchased
for off-premises consumption;
(9) The State of Nebraska and any political subdivision thereof
shall be strictly prohibited from imposing a tax on services or materials
used to manufacture products, including agricultural products, for sale
to the general public or to enhance services for sale to the general
public; and
(10) The State of Nebraska shall live within its revenue means in
the same way that a citizen lives within his or her revenue means.
Sec. 7. (1) Beginning January 1, 2028, there is hereby imposed a
tax on the use or consumption in the State of Nebraska of taxable
property or services.
(2) The rate of the consumption tax shall be seven and one-half
percent until changed by the Legislature.
(3) Counties, cities, and villages may impose an additional
consumption tax not to exceed one percent for the purpose of repaying
-7-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
bonds.
(4) The person purchasing taxable property or services in the State
of Nebraska shall be liable for the tax.
(5) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the tax shall be
collected by the registered seller. The tax shall constitute a part of
the purchase price and until collected shall be a debt from the purchaser
to the registered seller. The tax required to be collected by the
registered seller from the purchaser constitutes a debt owed by the
registered seller to the State of Nebraska.
(6) The registered seller shall, at the time of making the sale,
collect any tax which may be due from the purchaser and shall give to the
purchaser, upon request, a receipt therefor in the manner and form
prescribed by the Nebraska EPIC Option Consumption Tax Act.
(7) In order to prevent evasion of the consumption tax, it shall be
presumed that all gross payments from sales by registered sellers are
subject to the tax until the contrary is established. The burden of
proving that a sale is not a taxable sale is upon the registered seller
who makes the sale unless he or she takes and records from the purchaser
a tax-exempt certificate identification number.
(8) The Tax Commissioner, in order to enforce and facilitate the
proper administration of the consumption tax, may designate such person
or persons as he or she may deem necessary to be tax collectors and
delegate to such persons such authority as is necessary to collect any
such tax which is due and payable to the State of Nebraska. The Tax
Commissioner may require of all persons so designated a surety bond in
favor of the State of Nebraska to insure against any misappropriation of
state funds so collected. The Tax Commissioner may require any tax
official, city, county, or state, to collect the tax on behalf of the
state. All persons designated to or required to collect the tax shall
account for such collections in the manner prescribed by the Tax
Commissioner. Nothing in this subsection shall be so construed as to
-8-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
prevent the Tax Commissioner or his or her employees from collecting any
taxes due and payable to the State of Nebraska.
(9) In the sale of new automobiles, trucks, trailers, semitrailers,
and truck-tractors as defined in the Motor Vehicle Registration Act, the
consumption tax shall be paid to the county treasurer of the county where
the transaction took place. In the rental or lease of automobiles,
trucks, trailers, semitrailers, and truck-tractors as defined in the
Motor Vehicle Registration Act, the consumption tax shall be collected by
the lessor on the rental or lease price.
(10) In the case of taxable property or services purchased outside
of the State of Nebraska and brought into the State of Nebraska for use
or consumption in the State of Nebraska, the purchaser shall remit the
consumption tax on a form prescribed by the Tax Commissioner. Such form
shall be made available on the Department of Revenue's website. The tax
shall be due the month following the purchase date of the taxable
property or services.
(11) In the case of wages or salary paid by a taxable employer which
are taxable services, the employer shall remit the consumption tax in the
month following the date that the wages were paid.
(12) Property or services purchased for a business purpose in a
trade or business or for sale outside of the State of Nebraska and sold
untaxed that are subsequently converted to personal use in the State of
Nebraska shall be deemed purchased at the time of conversion and shall be
subject to the consumption tax at the fair market value of the converted
property as of the date of conversion. The tax shall be due as if the
property had been sold at the fair market value during the month of
conversion. The person using or consuming the converted property is
liable for and shall remit the tax on a form prescribed by the Tax
Commissioner.
(13) If gross payment for taxable property or services is made in
other than money, then the person responsible for collecting and
-9-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
remitting the tax shall remit the tax in money as if gross payment had
been made in money at the tax inclusive fair market value of the taxable
property or services purchased. This subsection shall not apply if the
tax inclusive fair market value of the property or services being
exchanged is less than twenty-five dollars.
(14) Real estate shall be taxed in the following way:
(a) The building and sale of a new structure, such as a dwelling, a
barn, a warehouse, or other building, shall be subject to the consumption
tax as long as the building or structure is never to be used for business
purposes;
(b) The building and sale of an addition to a structure, such as a
dwelling, a barn, a warehouse, or other building, shall be subject to the
consumption tax;
(c) The remodeling and sale of an already existing structure, such
as a dwelling, a barn, a warehouse, or other building, shall be subject
to the consumption tax;
(d) The sale of an already existing structure, such as a dwelling, a
barn, a warehouse, or other building, by any agent other than the seller
or purchaser of the real property shall be considered a taxable service
subject to the consumption tax in the following way:
(i) Any commission or fee imposed by an agent representing the
seller of the real property shall be subject to the consumption tax; and
(ii) Any commission or fee imposed by an agent representing the
purchaser of the real property shall be subject to the consumption tax;
and
(e) Land shall not be subject to the consumption tax.
(15) Insurance shall be taxed in the following way:
(a) Insurance premiums shall be subject to an insurance premium tax,
which is an excise tax, and shall not be subject to the consumption tax;
and
(b) Insurance claims shall not be subject to the consumption tax.
-10-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
Sec. 8. (1) No consumption tax shall be imposed on any taxable
property or service that is subject to an excise tax in this state. For
purposes of this subsection, excise tax means and includes:
(a) The tax on motor fuels under section 66-489;
(b) The tax on cigarettes under section 77-2602;
(c) The taxes on alcohol-related products under sections 53-160,
53-160.04, and 53-162;
(d) The tax on insurance premiums under section 77-908;
(e) The nameplate capacity tax under section 77-6203;
(f) Motor vehicle registration fees under the Motor Vehicle
Registration Act;
(g) The aircraft fuel tax under section 3-148;
(h) The documentary stamp tax under section 76-901;
(i) The petroleum release remedial action fee under section 66-1521;
(j) The state and county lodging taxes under the Nebraska Visitors
Development Act;
(k) The oil and gas severance tax under section 57-702;
(l) The corporate occupation tax under section 21-303;
(m) The oil and gas conservation charge under section 57-919;
(n) The uranium severance tax under section 57-1202; and
(o) All other fees imposed by government entities, including, but
not limited to, campsite rental fees, marriage license fees, and court
filing fees.
(2)(a) No consumption tax shall be imposed on any taxable property
or service purchased for a business purpose in a trade or business,
including a not-for-profit business.
(b) For purposes of this section, the term purchased for a business
purpose in a trade or business means purchased by a person engaged in a
trade or business and used in that trade or business:
(i) For resale;
(ii) To produce, provide, render, or sell taxable property or
-11-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
services; or
(iii) In furtherance of other bona fide business purposes.
(3)(a) No consumption tax shall be imposed on any taxable property
or service purchased for an investment purpose and held exclusively for
an investment purpose.
(b) For purposes of this section, the term purchased for an
investment purpose means purchased exclusively for purposes of
appreciation or the production of income.
(4) No consumption tax shall be imposed on any taxable property or
service used for educational purposes.
(5)(a) No consumption tax shall be imposed on used property.
(b) Any person selling only used goods at a garage sale, yard sale,
rummage sale, flea market, or farmers market shall not be held liable for
collecting and remitting the consumption tax.
(c) Any person owning or operating a thrift store or second-hand
store selling only used goods to the general public shall not be held
liable for collecting and remitting the consumption tax.
(d) Any person owning or operating a used-car lot where only used
cars are sold to the general public shall not be held liable for
collecting and remitting the consumption tax.
(e) Any person owning or operating a used-book store where only used
books are sold to the general public shall not be held liable for
collecting and remitting the consumption tax.
(f) Any person owning or operating any other kind of store or market
where only used items are sold to the general public shall not be held
liable for collecting and remitting the consumption tax.
(6) No consumption tax shall be imposed on groceries purchased for
off-premises consumption.
(7)(a) Any person engaging in a trade or business, including farms,
ranches, and not-for-profit businesses, may apply for a tax-exempt
certificate from the Tax Commissioner to be used when such person makes
-12-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
purchases for a business purpose in a trade or business as defined in
subdivision (2)(b) of this section.
(b) Such tax-exempt certificate shall contain a consumption tax
identification number that is unique to the person applying for the
certificate.
(c) The Tax Commissioner shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations for applying for a tax-exempt certificate by September 1,
2025.
(d) By no later than October 1, 2027, the Tax Commissioner shall
create an application for a tax-exempt certificate and shall make such
application available in electronic form on the website of the Department
of Revenue and in paper form at designated offices of the Department of
Revenue as determined by the Tax Commissioner. The Tax Commissioner shall
also mail a paper application form through the United States Postal
Service whenever a written request for such form is received by the Tax
Commissioner and such request contains the name of a business operating
in Nebraska or the name of a person who is a legal resident of Nebraska
and a legal address in the United States of America.
(e) When property or services are purchased for a business purpose
in a trade or business as defined in subdivision (2)(b) of this section,
the purchaser may present his or her tax-exempt certificate to the
registered seller who shall record the identification number on the
certificate and refrain from imposing the consumption tax.
(f) The registered seller shall keep a record of the tax-exempt
transaction along with the identification number on the tax-exempt
certificate for a period of at least three years following the date of
the transaction. A record of the purchaser's identification number on the
tax-exempt certificate shall normally constitute sufficient evidence to
absolve the registered seller of any illicit wrongdoing or fraud when the
transaction was made. The burden of proof shall lie with the purchaser to
demonstrate that the tax-exempt transaction was a lawful transaction.
-13-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
(g) The Tax Commissioner may issue a tax-exempt certificate in the
form of a card with microchip technology to protect the identification
number of the tax-exempt certificate from public view. The Tax
Commissioner may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for using
such card with registered sellers.
Sec. 9. (1) The consumption tax imposed under the Nebraska EPIC
Option Consumption Tax Act is a destination principle tax. This section
shall govern for purposes of determining whether the destination of
taxable property and services is within or outside of the State of
Nebraska.
(2) The destination of tangible personal property shall be the state
or territory in which the property was first delivered to the purchaser,
including agents and authorized representatives.
(3) The destination of real property, or rents or leaseholds on real
property, shall be the state or territory in which the real property is
located.
(4) The destination of any other taxable property, including
intangible property, shall be the residence of the purchaser.
(5)(a) Unless provided otherwise in this section, the destination of
services shall be the state or territory in which the use or consumption
of the services occurred. Allocation of service invoices relating to more
than one jurisdiction shall be on the basis of time or another method
determined by rule and regulation of the Tax Commissioner.
(b) The destination of telecommunications services shall be the
residence of the purchaser. Telecommunications services include
telephone, including cell phone, beeper, radio, cable television,
satellite, and computer online or network services.
(c) For transportation services where both the origin and the final
destination are within the State of Nebraska, the destination of the
transportation services shall be the State of Nebraska. For
transportation services where the final destination is outside the State
-14-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
of Nebraska but the origin of the trip is inside the State of Nebraska,
the service amount shall be deemed one hundred percent attributable to
the State of Nebraska. For transportation services that originate outside
the State of Nebraska but the final destination is inside the State of
Nebraska, the service amount shall be deemed zero percent attributable to
the State of Nebraska.
(d) The destination of electrical services shall be the residence of
the purchaser.
(e) The destination of financial intermediation services as defined
in section 27 of this act shall be the location where the transaction
originated.
(f)(i) Except as provided in subdivision (5)(f)(ii) of this section,
the destination of rents paid for the lease of tangible property and
leaseholds on such property shall be where the property is located while
in use.
(ii) The destination of rental and lease payments on land vehicles,
aircraft, and watercraft shall be:
(A) In the case of rentals and leases of a term of one month or
less, the location where the land vehicle, aircraft, or watercraft was
originally delivered to the renter or lessee; and
(B) In the case of rentals and leases of a term greater than one
month, the residence of the renter or lessee.
Sec. 10. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, on or
before the fifteenth day of each month, each registered seller or person
who is liable to collect and remit the consumption tax or who is liable
to pay any consumption tax which is not collected shall submit to the Tax
Commissioner, on a form prescribed by the Tax Commissioner, a report
relating to the previous calendar month along with the consumption taxes
due for such month in the proper manner and form prescribed by the Tax
Commissioner. The content of such report shall include:
(a) The gross payments received for the month;
-15-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
(b) The tax collected in connection with such payments;
(c) The amount and type of any credit claimed; and
(d) Any other information reasonably required by the Tax
Commissioner for the administration, collection, and remittance of the
consumption tax.
(2) The Tax Commissioner may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations granting to registered sellers whose yearly tax liability is
less than three thousand dollars the privilege of remitting consumption
taxes on a quarterly basis, and those whose yearly tax liability is less
than nine hundred dollars the privilege of remitting consumption taxes on
an annual basis.
(3) A registered seller shall deduct and withhold, from the
consumption taxes otherwise due from him or her, twenty-five hundredths
of one percent of the consumption taxes collected in order to reimburse
himself or herself for the cost of collecting the tax.
(4)(a) On application, an extension of thirty days to file the
report and to remit the tax due under subsection (1) of this section
shall be automatically granted if the application is made on or before
the due date on a form prescribed by the Tax Commissioner.
(b) On application, an extension of sixty days to file the report
and to remit the tax due under subsection (1) of this section may be
granted by the Tax Commissioner if reasonable cause for the delay is
presented in writing to the Tax Commissioner on a form prescribed by the
Tax Commissioner. The sixty-day extension shall be liberally granted.
(c) No extensions beyond sixty days shall be granted by the Tax
Commissioner.
(5) A registered seller may remit the taxes due in electronic form
or by check, credit card, draft, money order, or other payment approved
by the Tax Commissioner. Post-dated checks and postage stamps shall not
be sent as payment. Cash may be used when payment is made in person at a
designated office of the Department of Revenue as determined by the Tax
-16-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
Commissioner.
(6)(a) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) Large seller means any seller that has collected more than one
hundred thousand dollars of consumption taxes in the previous twelve
months; and
(ii) Week means the seven-day period ending on a Saturday.
(b) A large seller shall remit to the Tax Commissioner the entire
balance of consumption taxes due on the first Monday or first business
day following the end of each week. The Tax Commissioner may by rule and
regulation require the electronic transfer of funds due from large
sellers to the Tax Commissioner.
(c) A large seller is required to provide security in an amount
equal to the greater of one hundred thousand dollars or one and one-half
times the seller's average monthly tax liability during the previous six
calendar months. Security may be a cash bond, a bond from a surety
company approved by the Tax Commissioner, a certificate of deposit, or a
state or United States treasury bond. A bond qualifying under this
subdivision must be a continuing instrument for each calendar year or
portion thereof that the bond is in effect. The bond must remain in
effect until the surety or sureties are released and discharged. Failure
to provide security in accordance with this subdivision shall result in
revocation of the large seller's registration. Upon receipt of an
application on a form prescribed by the Tax Commissioner, a large seller
may, at the discretion of the Tax Commissioner, be allowed to operate
without complying with this subdivision for a period not to exceed six
months. If a person has provided security pursuant to this subdivision,
the security or part of the security may be forfeited in favor of the Tax
Commissioner to the extent of the consumption tax due plus any interest
if:
(i) The large seller fails to pay an amount indicated in a final
notice of an amount due within thirty days of the notice;
-17-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
(ii) Either the time for filing an appeal has passed or the appeal
has been denied; and
(iii) The amount due is not being litigated in any judicial forum.
(7) The report required under this section shall be deemed properly
filed with the Tax Commissioner when:
(a) The report is deposited into the United States mail, postage
paid, properly addressed to the Department of Revenue, and bearing a
postmark on or before the due date as determined by this section;
(b) The report is delivered in person and accepted at a designated
office of the Department of Revenue on or before the due date as
determined by this section;
(c) The report is provided to a designated commercial private
courier service for delivery within two days to the designated office of
the Department of Revenue and the receipt bears a date on or before the
due date as determined by this section; or
(d) The report is delivered by other means permitted by the Tax
Commissioner on or before the due date as determined by this section.
(8) The Tax Commissioner shall establish a system under which a
violation of the Nebraska EPIC Option Consumption Tax Act can be brought
to the attention of the Tax Commissioner for investigation through the
use of a hotline or toll-free telephone number, through online reporting,
or otherwise.
(9) The Tax Commissioner is hereby authorized to develop and
maintain a program of awards in which individuals may be recognized and
rewarded in a manner deemed appropriate by the Tax Commissioner for
discovering, reporting, and prosecuting tax fraud.
Sec. 11. (1) Any person liable to collect and remit consumption
taxes as provided in the Nebraska EPIC Option Consumption Tax Act shall
register with the Tax Commissioner, including:
(a) Any person who is engaged in a trade or business; and
(b) Any person located outside this state who is engaged in sales of
-18-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
taxable property or services into this state, including retail sales,
remote or internet sales, and the provision of financial intermediation
services.
(2) Affiliated firms shall be treated as one person for purposes of
this section. Affiliated firms may elect, upon giving notice to the Tax
Commissioner in a manner prescribed by the Tax Commissioner, to treat
separate firms as separate persons.
(3) Every person registered pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section shall designate a tax matters person who shall be an individual
whom the Tax Commissioner may contact regarding tax matters. Each person
registered must provide notice of a change in the identity of the tax
matters person within thirty days of such change.
(4) Any person who is required to register and who fails to do so is
prohibited from selling taxable property or services. The Tax
Commissioner may bring an action seeking a temporary restraining order,
an injunction, or such other order as may be deemed appropriate to
enforce this section.
(5) The Tax Commissioner may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations for the issuing of certificates to persons required to
register under this section.
Sec. 12. (1) Registered sellers and other persons shall report
transactions using the cash method of accounting unless an election to
use the accrual method of accounting is made pursuant to subsection (2)
of this section.
(2) A person may elect with respect to a calendar year to remit
taxes and report transactions with respect to the month in which the sale
was invoiced and accrued.
Sec. 13. (1) Any person who is required to register under section
11 of this act but fails to do so prior to notification by the Tax
Commissioner shall be liable for a civil penalty of five hundred dollars.
(2)(a) Any person who is required to and who recklessly or willfully
-19-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
fails to collect taxes imposed by the Nebraska EPIC Option Consumption
Tax Act has committed an act of fraud and shall be liable for a civil
penalty equal to the greater of five hundred dollars or twenty percent of
the tax not collected.
(b) Any person who is required to and who willfully fails as part of
a trade or business to collect taxes imposed by the act shall be guilty
of a Class IV felony.
(3)(a) Any person who recklessly or willfully asserts an invalid
exemption from the consumption tax has committed an act of fraud and
shall be liable for a civil penalty equal to the greater of five hundred
dollars or twenty percent of the tax not collected.
(b) Any person who willfully asserts an invalid exemption from the
consumption tax shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.
(4)(a) Any person who is required to and who recklessly or willfully
fails to remit consumption taxes collected from purchasers has committed
an act of fraud and shall be liable for a civil penalty equal to the
greater of one thousand dollars or thirty percent of the taxes not
remitted.
(b) Any person who willfully fails to remit consumption taxes
collected from purchasers shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.
(5) Any person who is required to and who recklessly or willfully
fails to pay consumption taxes shall be liable for a civil penalty equal
to the greater of five hundred dollars or one hundred percent of the tax
not paid.
(6)(a) In the case of a failure by any person who is required to and
who fails to file a report required under section 10 of this act on or
before the due date for such report, such person shall pay a penalty for
each month or fraction thereof that such report is late equal to the
greater of fifty dollars or one-half of one percent of the gross payments
required to be shown on the report.
(b) The amount of the penalty under subdivision (6)(a) of this
-20-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
section shall be doubled with respect to any report filed after a written
inquiry regarding such report is received by the taxpayer from the Tax
Commissioner.
(c) No penalty shall be imposed under this subsection with respect
to any failure to submit a report if it can be shown that such failure
was due to reasonable cause.
(d) In addition to penalties not imposed by reason of subdivision
(6)(c) of this section, the Tax Commissioner shall, upon application or
appeal, waive the penalty imposed pursuant to this subsection once per
registered person per twenty-four-month period. This waiver shall not
apply to any decision of a court.
(7)(a) Any person who recklessly or willfully uses a tax-exempt
certificate to purchase items for personal use, as a gift to another
person, or for resale to another person has committed an act of fraud and
shall be liable for a civil penalty equal to the greater of five hundred
dollars or one hundred percent of the tax not collected.
(b) Any person who willfully uses a tax-exempt certificate to
purchase items for personal use, as a gift to another person, or for
resale to another person shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.
(8) Any person who recklessly or willfully accepts a false tax-
exempt certificate shall pay a civil penalty equal to twenty percent of
the tax not collected by reason of such acceptance.
(9) Any person who is required to timely remit consumption taxes and
who remits such taxes more than one month after the taxes are due shall
pay a civil penalty equal to one percent of the amount due per month or
fraction thereof from the due date. The penalty imposed by this
subsection shall never exceed twenty-four percent.
(10) In addition to other penalty reductions allowed under this
section, any person who is required to pay a civil penalty under the
Nebraska EPIC Option Consumption Tax Act may have such penalty reduced to
one-half the amount owed, at the discretion of the Tax Commissioner, when
-21-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
it can be shown that the lack of payment was due to hardship or
reasonable cause.
(11) If any check or money order in payment of any amount due under
the Nebraska EPIC Option Consumption Tax Act is not duly paid, in
addition to other penalties provided by law, the person who tendered such
check or money order shall pay a civil penalty equal to the greater of:
(a) Twenty-five dollars; or
(b) Two percent of the amount of the check or money order.
(12) The tax matters person designated pursuant to section 11 of
this act and responsible officers or partners of a firm shall be jointly
and severally liable for the consumption tax and any penalties imposed
under the act.
(13) If more than one person is liable with respect to any tax or
penalty imposed under the act, each person who paid such tax or penalty
shall be entitled to recover from other persons who are liable for such
tax or penalty an amount equal to the excess of the amount paid by such
person over such person's proportionate share of the tax or penalty in
accordance with rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the Tax
Commissioner. Such rules and regulations may take culpability into
account when allocating liability for the tax or penalty among
responsible officers or partners.
(14) The fact that a civil penalty has been imposed shall not
prevent the imposition of a criminal fine.
(15) The fact that a criminal fine has been imposed shall not
prevent the imposition of a civil penalty.
Sec. 14. In all disputes concerning consumption taxes, the person
engaged in a dispute with the Tax Commissioner shall have the burden of
production of documents and records but the Tax Commissioner shall have
the burden of persuasion. In all disputes concerning an exemption claimed
by the purchaser, if the seller has on file a tax-exempt certificate from
the purchaser and did not have reasonable cause to believe that the
-22-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
certificate was improperly provided by the purchaser with respect to such
purchase, then the burden of production of documents and records relating
to such exemption shall rest with the purchaser and not with the seller.
Sec. 15. (1) Persons are subject to administrative summons by the
Tax Commissioner for documents, records, and testimony required by the
Tax Commissioner to accurately determine liability for the consumption
tax. A summons shall be served by the Tax Commissioner by an attested
copy delivered in hand to the person to whom it is directed or left at
his or her last-known address. The summons shall describe with reasonable
certainty what is sought.
(2) The Tax Commissioner has the authority to conduct at a
reasonable time and place assessments, examinations, and audits of
persons who are or may be liable to collect and remit the consumption tax
and to examine the books, papers, documents, records, software, and other
data of such persons which may be relevant or material to the
determination of tax due.
(3) No administrative summons may be issued by the Tax Commissioner
and no action may be commenced to enforce an administrative summons with
respect to any person if a referral to the Attorney General's office is
in effect with respect to such person relating to a tax imposed by the
Nebraska EPIC Option Consumption Tax Act. Such referral is in effect with
respect to any person if the Tax Commissioner has recommended to the
Attorney General's office a grand jury investigation of such person or a
criminal prosecution of such person that contemplates criminal sanctions
under the act. A referral shall be terminated when:
(a) The Attorney General's office notifies the Tax Commissioner that
the Attorney General will not:
(i) Prosecute such person for any offense connected with the tax
laws;
(ii) Authorize a grand jury investigation of such person with
respect to such offense; or
-23-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
(iii) Continue such a grand jury investigation; or
(b) A final disposition has been made of any criminal proceeding
connected with tax laws against such person.
Sec. 16. Any person liable to remit consumption taxes shall keep
records in paper or electronic form that are sufficient to determine the
amounts reported, collected, and remitted for a period of three years
after the later of the filing of the report for which the records formed
the basis or the date when the report was due to be filed. Such records
shall include documentation for all sales that were exempt under
subsection (2) of section 8 of this act, including the purchasers' tax-
exempt certificates and tax identification numbers and the net of tax
amounts of purchase. Any purchaser who purchased taxable property or
services but did not pay tax by reason of asserting such an exemption
shall keep records sufficient to determine whether such exemption was
valid for a period of three years after the purchase of taxable property
or services.
Sec. 17. (1) For each purchase of taxable property or services for
which a consumption tax is imposed, the registered seller shall provide
the purchaser with a receipt for each transaction that includes:
(a) The property or service;
(b) The sales price of such property or service exclusive of tax;
(c) The amount of consumption tax paid;
(d) The property or service price inclusive of the consumption tax;
(e) The consumption tax rate;
(f) The date that the property or service was purchased;
(g) The name of the registered seller, retailer, or vendor;
(h) The address of the registered seller, retailer, or vendor; and
(i) The registered seller's consumption tax registration number;
(2) The tax imposed by the Nebraska EPIC Option Consumption Tax Act
shall apply to all vending machines. For purposes of this subsection,
vending machines are machines that dispense taxable property or services
-24-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
in exchange for coins or currency. Vending machines shall not be required
to dispense the receipt described in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The requirements of subsection (1) of this section shall not
apply in the case of financial intermediation services as defined in
section 27 of this act.
Sec. 18. (1) The proceeds of the taxes paid pursuant to the
Nebraska EPIC Option Consumption Tax Act shall be collected by the
Department of Revenue and remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to
the General Fund.
(2) The State Treasurer shall be responsible for disbursing the
revenue in accordance with the state's budget and any other outstanding
liabilities.
Sec. 19. (1) The Tax Commissioner may seize property, garnish wages
or salary, and file liens to collect amounts due under the Nebraska EPIC
Option Consumption Tax Act pursuant to enforcement of:
(a) A judgment duly rendered by a court of law;
(b) An amount due if the taxpayer has failed to exercise his or her
appeal rights under the act; or
(c) An amount due if the appeal process determined that an amount
remained due and the taxpayer has failed to timely petition a court for
relief.
(2) Subject to such reasonable rules and regulations as the Tax
Commissioner may adopt and promulgate, any lien imposed with respect to a
consumption tax shall be released not later than thirty days after:
(a) The liability was satisfied or became unenforceable; or
(b) A bond was accepted as security.
Sec. 20. Decisions of the Tax Commissioner under the Nebraska EPIC
Option Consumption Tax Act may be appealed, and the appeal shall be in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.
Sec. 21. In all disputes concerning consumption taxes, the person
engaged in a dispute with the Tax Commissioner may be entitled to
-25-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
reasonable attorney's fees, accountancy fees, and other reasonable
professional fees incurred in direct relation to the dispute unless the
Tax Commissioner establishes that his or her position was substantially
justified.
Sec. 22. No addition to tax shall be made under section 13 of this
act with respect to a period during which a case is pending under Title
11 of the United States Code:
(1) If such tax was incurred by the estate and the failure occurred
pursuant to an order of the court finding probable insufficiency of funds
of the estate to pay administrative expenses; or
(2) If (a) such tax was incurred by the debtor before the earlier of
the order for relief or, in the involuntary case, the appointment of a
trustee and (b) the petition was filed before the due date prescribed by
law, including extensions, for filing a return of such tax, or the date
for making the addition to tax occurs on or after the date the petition
was filed.
Sec. 23. (1) Any person selling one or more chances is a gaming
sponsor and shall register, in a form prescribed by the Tax Commissioner,
with the Tax Commissioner as a gaming sponsor, except that a not-for-
profit organization as defined in section 26 of this act that has gross
receipts from the sale of chances of less than five thousand dollars
during any calendar year shall not be required to register.
(2) For purposes of this section, the term chance means a lottery
ticket, a raffle ticket, chips, other tokens, a bet placed, a wager
placed, or any similar device where the purchase of the right gives rise
to an obligation by the gaming sponsor to pay upon the occurrence of:
(a) A random or unpredictable event; or
(b) An event over which neither the gaming sponsor nor the person
purchasing the chance has control over the outcome.
(3) The taxable gaming services of a gaming sponsor shall be subject
to the consumption tax. For purposes of this section, taxable gaming
-26-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
services means the gross receipts of the gaming sponsor from the sale of
chances.
(4) The consumption tax shall be collected and remitted by the
gaming sponsor. The tax shall be remitted by the fifteenth day of each
month with respect to taxable gaming services during the previous
calendar month.
Sec. 24. (1) Purchases of taxable property or services by the
federal government shall be subject to the consumption tax.
(2) Purchases of taxable property or services by state governments,
including the State of Nebraska, and any political subdivisions shall be
subject to the consumption tax.
Sec. 25. (1) Nothing in the Nebraska EPIC Option Consumption Tax
Act shall be construed to exempt any federal, state, or local
governmental unit or political subdivision operating a government
enterprise from collecting and remitting the consumption tax on any sale
of taxable property or services. Government enterprises shall comply with
all duties imposed by the act and shall be liable for penalties and
subject to enforcement actions in the same manner as private persons that
are not government enterprises.
(2) For purposes of this section, government enterprise means any
entity owned or operated by a federal, state, or local governmental unit
or political subdivision that receives gross payments from private
persons, except that a government-owned entity shall not be considered a
government enterprise for purposes of this section unless in any calendar
month it has revenue from selling taxable property or services exceeding
one thousand dollars.
(3) Government enterprises shall not be subject to tax on purchases
that would not be subject to tax if the government enterprise were a
private enterprise, except that government enterprises may not use such
exemption to serve as a conduit for tax-free purchases by government
units that would otherwise be subject to taxation on purchases pursuant
-27-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
to section 24 of this act. Transfers of taxable property or services
purchased exempt from tax from a government enterprise to such government
unit shall be taxable.
(4) Any government enterprise must maintain books of account,
separate from the nonenterprise government accounts, maintained in
accordance with generally acceptable accounting principles.
(5) A government enterprise shall be treated as a trade or business
for purposes of the Nebraska EPIC Option Consumption Tax Act.
(6) A transfer of funds to a government enterprise by a government
entity without full consideration shall constitute a taxable government
purchase within the meaning of section 24 of this act to the extent that
the transfer of funds exceeds the fair market value of the consideration.
Sec. 26. (1) For purposes of this section, not-for-profit
organization means a not-for-profit organization organized and operated
exclusively:
(a) For religious purposes;
(b) For charitable purposes;
(c) For scientific purposes;
(d) For purposes of testing for public safety;
(e) For literary purposes;
(f) For educational purposes;
(g) For purposes of civic duty or social welfare;
(h) For labor purposes;
(i) For agricultural or horticultural purposes;
(j) As chambers of commerce, business leagues, or trade
associations; or
(k) As fraternal beneficiary societies, orders, lodges, or
associations, of which no part of the net earnings inures to the benefit
of any private shareholder or individual.
(2) Any not-for-profit organization shall be required to pay the
consumption tax, except that no tax shall be imposed on employee wages or
-28-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
salary.
Sec. 27. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Explicitly charged fees for financial intermediation services
includes:
(i) Brokerage fees;
(ii) Explicitly stated banking, loan, automatic teller machine, or
other similar fees;
(iii) Safe deposit box fees;
(iv) Insurance premiums, to the extent such premiums are not
allocable to the investment account of the underlying insurance policy;
(v) Trustees' fees; and
(vi) Other financial services fees, including mutual fund management
fees, sales fees, and exit fees;
(b) Financial intermediation services means the sum of:
(i) Explicitly charged fees for financial intermediation services;
and
(ii) Implicitly charged fees for financial intermediation services;
(c) Gross imputed amount means:
(i) With respect to any underlying interest-bearing investment or
account, the product of:
(A) The excess, if any, of the basic interest rate as described in
section 29 of this act over the rate paid on such investment; and
(B) The amount of the investment or account; and
(ii) With respect to any underlying interest-bearing debt, the
product of:
(A) The excess, if any, of the rate paid on such debt over the basic
interest rate as described in section 29 of this act; and
(B) The amount of the debt; and
(d) Implicitly charged fees for financial intermediation services
includes the gross imputed amount in relation to any underlying interest-
bearing investment, account, or debt.
-29-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
(2) For purposes of the Nebraska EPIC Option Consumption Tax Act,
the seller of financial intermediation services shall be:
(a) In the case of explicitly charged fees for financial
intermediation services, the person who receives the gross payments for
the charged financial intermediation services;
(b) In the case of implicitly charged fees for financial
intermediation services with respect to any underlying interest-bearing
investment or account, the person making the interest payments on the
interest-bearing investment or account; and
(c) In the case of implicitly charged fees for financial
intermediation services with respect to any interest-bearing debt, the
person receiving the interest payments on the interest-bearing debt.
(3) The consumption tax on financial intermediation services with
respect to an underlying investment account or debt shall be imposed and
collected with the same frequency that statements are rendered by the
financial institution in connection with the investment account or debt
but not less frequently than quarterly.
(4) Financial intermediation services shall be deemed as used or
consumed within the State of Nebraska if the person purchasing the
services is a resident of the State of Nebraska.
(5) Any person that provides financial intermediation services to
Nebraska residents must, as a condition of lawfully providing such
services, designate, in a form prescribed by the Tax Commissioner, a tax
representative for purposes of the Nebraska EPIC Option Consumption Tax
Act. The tax representative shall be responsible for ensuring that the
consumption tax is collected and remitted and shall be jointly and
severally liable for collecting and remitting such tax. The Tax
Commissioner may bring an action seeking a temporary restraining order,
an injunction, or such other order as may be appropriate to enforce this
subsection.
Sec. 28. (1) For purposes of this section, financing lease means
-30-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
any lease under which the lessee has the right to acquire the property
for fifty percent or less of its fair market value at the end of the
lease term.
(2) Financing leases shall be subject to the consumption tax as
prescribed in this section.
(3) The Tax Commissioner shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations for disaggregating the principal and interest components of a
financing lease. The principal amount shall be determined to the extent
possible by examination of the contemporaneous sales price of property
the same or similar as the leased property.
(4) In the event that contemporaneous sales prices or property the
same or similar as the leased property is not available, the principal
and interest components of a financing lease shall be disaggregated using
the applicable interest rate as determined under section 30 of this act
plus four percent.
(5) The principal component of the financing lease shall be subject
to tax as if a purchase in the amount of the principal component had been
made on the day on which such lease was executed.
(6) The financial intermediation services amount with respect to the
interest component of the financing lease shall be subject to the
consumption tax.
(7) If the principal component and financial intermediation services
amount with respect to the interest component of a lease have been taxed
pursuant to this section, then the gross lease or rental payments shall
not be subject to additional tax.
Sec. 29. For purposes of the Nebraska EPIC Option Consumption Tax
Act, the basic interest rate with respect to a debt instrument,
investment, financing lease, or account shall be the applicable interest
rate as determined under section 30 of this act. For debt instruments,
investments, or accounts of contractually fixed interest, the applicable
interest rate of the month of issuance shall apply. For debt instruments,
-31-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
investments, or accounts of variable interest rates and which have no
reference interest rate, the applicable interest rate shall be the
federal short-term interest rate for each month. For debt instruments,
investments, or accounts of variable interest rates and which have a
reference interest rate, the applicable interest rate shall be the
applicable interest rate for the reference interest rate for each month.
Sec. 30. (1) In the case of a debt instrument, investment,
financing lease, or account with a term of not over three years, the
applicable interest rate is the federal short-term rate as determined by
the United States Secretary of the Treasury.
(2) In the case of a debt instrument, investment, financing lease,
or account with a term of over three years but not over nine years, the
applicable interest rate is the federal mid-term rate as determined by
the United States Secretary of the Treasury.
(3) In the case of a debt instrument, investment, financing lease,
or account with a term of over nine years, the applicable interest rate
is the federal long-term rate as determined by the United States
Secretary of the Treasury.
(4) The Tax Commissioner shall publish the applicable rates monthly.
If the United States Secretary of the Treasury ceases to determine or
publish the relevant federal interest rates, the Tax Commissioner shall
determine and publish the applicable rates using the same methodology
used by the Secretary of the Treasury, as nearly as is practical, prior
to the Secretary of the Treasury discontinuing such determination or
publication.
(5) Interest on any past due consumption taxes shall be at the rate
specified in section 45-104.02, as such rate may from time to time be
adjusted.
Sec. 31. (1) Up to one thousand dollars of gross payments per
calendar year shall be exempt from the consumption tax if:
(a) Made by a person not in connection with a trade or business at
-32-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
any time during such calendar year prior to making such gross payments;
and
(b) Made to purchase any taxable property or service which is
brought into Nebraska by such person for use or consumption by such
person in Nebraska.
(2) Up to five thousand dollars per calendar year of gross payments
shall be exempt from the consumption tax if received:
(a) By a person not in connection with a trade or business during
such calendar year prior to the receipt of such gross payments; and
(b) In connection with a casual or isolated sale.
(3) Up to ten thousand dollars per calendar year of gross payments
received by a person from the sale of financial intermediation services
as defined in section 27 of this act may be claimed as a credit and
applied to the tax imposed by the Nebraska EPIC Option Consumption Tax
Act. The credit provided by this subsection is in addition to other
credits afforded by the act. The credit provided by this subsection shall
not be available to large sellers as defined in section 10 of this act.
(4) If a registered seller provides taxable property or services to
a person either as a gift, prize, or reward or as remuneration for
employment and such taxable property or services were not previously
subject to tax, then the provision of such taxable property or services
by the registered seller shall be deemed the conversion of such taxable
property or services to personal use and subject to tax pursuant to
subsection (12) of section 7 of this act at the tax inclusive fair market
value of such taxable property or services.
(5) The substance of a transaction shall prevail over its form if:
(a) The transaction has no bona fide economic purpose; and
(b) The transaction is designed to evade the tax imposed by the
Nebraska EPIC Option Consumption Tax Act.
(6) When the last day prescribed for performing any action required
by the Nebraska EPIC Option Consumption Tax Act falls on a Saturday,
-33-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
Sunday, or legal holiday, the performance of such action shall be
considered timely if it is performed on the next day which is not a
Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday.
Sec. 32. (1) Inventory held by a trade or business at the close of
business on December 31, 2027, shall be considered qualified inventory if
it is sold:
(a) Before December 31, 2028;
(b) By a registered seller; and
(c) Subject to the tax imposed by the Nebraska EPIC Option
Consumption Tax Act.
(2) For purposes of this section, qualified inventory shall have the
cost that it had for federal income tax purposes for the trade or
business as of December 31, 2027, including any amounts capitalized by
reason of section 263A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.
(3) The trade or business which held the qualified inventory at the
close of business on December 31, 2027, shall be entitled to a
transitional inventory credit equal to the cost of the qualified
inventory, as determined in accordance with subsection (2) of this
section, times the rate of the consumption tax imposed by section 7 of
this act.
(4) The credit provided under subsection (3) of this section shall
be allowed with respect to the month when the inventory is sold subject
to the consumption tax. The person claiming such credit shall attach
supporting schedules in the form that the Tax Commissioner may prescribe.
(5) Qualified inventory held by registered sellers that sell such
qualified inventory not subject to the consumption tax shall be eligible
for the transitional inventory credit only if that business, or a
business that has successor rights pursuant to subsection (6) of this
section, receives certification in a form satisfactory to the Tax
Commissioner that the qualified inventory was subsequently sold subject
to the consumption tax.
-34-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
(6) The trade or business entitled to the transitional inventory
credit may sell the right to receive such transitional inventory credit
to the purchaser of the qualified inventory that gave rise to the credit
entitlement. Any purchaser of such qualified inventory, or property or
services into which the qualified inventory has been incorporated, may
sell the right to such transitional inventory credit to a subsequent
purchaser of such qualified inventory, or property or services into which
the qualified inventory has been incorporated.
Sec. 33. (1) At least seven calendar days before the commencement
of an examination of the books and records of a registered seller, the
Department of Revenue shall provide to the registered seller through the
United States Postal Service a pamphlet written in simple and
nontechnical language containing the Nebraska Taxpayer's Bill of Rights
listed in section 6 of this act along with a statement explaining the
taxpayer's right to be represented by legal counsel during an
examination, a statement explaining the taxpayer's right to file an
appeal, and a statement explaining the taxpayer's right to know the
criteria and procedures used to select persons for such examinations.
(2) At least seven days before the issuance of a preliminary
assessment, the Department of Revenue shall provide to the registered
seller through the United States Postal Service a written description of:
(a) The basis for the assessment, including any penalties asserted
with respect to the assessment; and
(b) The method by which the registered seller may request an
administrative or judicial review of the assessment.
(3) At or before the issuance of a final assessment, the Department
of Revenue shall inform the registered seller by way of a written
statement of his or her right to appeal such assessment.
(4) Except in cases involving suspected criminal violations of the
tax law or other criminal activity, the Department of Revenue shall
conduct an examination of a registered seller during the regular business
-35-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
hours of 8:00 a.m. to 5:00 p.m. Central Standard Time, or Mountain
Standard Time whenever the examination takes place where Mountain
Standard Time applies, during the weekdays of Monday through Friday after
providing written notice of the examination through the United States
Postal Service at least fifteen days prior to the date of the
examination. A registered seller who refuses a proposed time for an
examination on the grounds that the proposed examination date and time
would cause an undue burden or hardship must contact the Department of
Revenue to arrange an alternative date and time for such examination. The
alternative date and time must be agreeable to both the Department of
Revenue and the registered seller within reason and must be scheduled no
later than ninety days from the date of the original notice.
(5) At all stages of an examination and in any appeal of an
assessment, a registered seller is entitled to be assisted or
represented, at his or her own expense, by an authorized representative.
The Department of Revenue shall prescribe a form by which the registered
seller may designate a person to represent him or her in the conduct of
any proceedings, including collection proceedings, resulting from action
taken by the Department of Revenue. In the absence of this form, the
Department of Revenue or the applicable court may accept such other
evidence that a person is the authorized representative of a registered
seller as it considers appropriate. This subsection shall not be
construed as authorizing the practice of law before the Department of
Revenue or any court of law in the State of Nebraska by a person who is
not a licensed attorney.
(6) A registered seller shall be allowed to make a video or audio
recording of any in-person interview with any officer or employee of the
Department of Revenue, including the Tax Commissioner, whenever such
interview relates to any assessment, examination, or investigation of the
registered seller's tax liabilities. However, the registered seller must
provide reasonable advance notice to the Department of Revenue of his or
-36-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
her intent to record the interview. Any such recording shall be at the
registered seller's expense and with the registered seller's own
equipment. Unless it can be shown that the recording has been altered,
edited, or tampered with in any way, such recording shall be permitted as
evidence in a court of law.
(7) The Tax Commissioner or any other employee of the Department of
Revenue shall be allowed to make a video or audio recording of any
interview with a registered seller if the registered seller is making a
video or audio recording of the interview or if reasonable advance notice
is given to the registered seller before the interview. The Tax
Commissioner or an employee of the Department of Revenue shall provide
the registered seller with a transcript or a copy of the recording, but
only if the registered seller interviewed provides reimbursement for the
cost of the transcript or reproduction of the recording. Any such
reproductive cost shall be reasonable as prescribed by rules and
regulations adopted and promulgated by the Tax Commissioner.
(8) For purposes of this section only, the term registered seller
includes any person selling taxable property or services who is or should
be registered with the Tax Commissioner as a registered seller.
Sec. 34. (1) The Department of Revenue shall maintain a continuing
education program to train employees of the department and to provide
them with a current knowledge of state and applicable federal tax laws.
(2) Beginning in the year 2029, the Tax Commissioner shall prepare
an annual report and present such report in person to the Revenue
Committee of the Legislature concerning information about the number and
kind of audits, assessments, or examinations conducted by the Department
of Revenue throughout the previous year. The Revenue Committee shall bear
the responsibility for scheduling the Tax Commissioner's annual report.
(3) The Department of Revenue shall be strictly forbidden from using
the amount of consumption taxes assessed by an employee of the Department
of Revenue as the basis for evaluating an employee's performance on the
-37-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
job.
(4) The Tax Commissioner shall develop procedures for monitoring the
performance of employees of the Department of Revenue which may include
the use of evaluations obtained from taxpayers.
(5) If the Tax Commissioner or the Department of Revenue fails to
comply with any of the provisions of the Nebraska EPIC Option Consumption
Tax Act, such failure shall not prevent the Tax Commissioner or the
Department of Revenue from assessing any tax as provided in the act nor
shall it excuse any registered seller from timely complying with any time
limitations imposed by the act. However, if the Tax Commissioner or the
Department of Revenue fails to substantially comply with the provisions
of the act, the Tax Commissioner shall, upon application by the
registered seller or other good cause shown, abate any penalties
otherwise arising from an assessment or examination.
(6) The Tax Commissioner shall abate any penalty attributable to
erroneous written advice furnished to a registered seller by an employee
of the Department of Revenue. However, this subsection shall apply only
if the Department of Revenue's employee provided the written advice in
good faith while acting in his or her official capacity, the written
advice was reasonably relied upon by the registered seller and was in
response to a specific written request of the registered seller, and the
penalty did not result from the registered seller's failure to provide
adequate or accurate information.
Sec. 35. (1) The Tax Commissioner may enter into written agreements
to allow any registered seller to pay the consumption tax in installment
payments if the Tax Commissioner determines that such an agreement will
facilitate the collection of such tax. Such agreements shall be entered
into only regarding a tax that has been finally assessed by the Tax
Commissioner or the Department of Revenue and not appealed, and such
agreements shall not exceed a period lasting more than twelve months,
except that any such agreement may be renewed at the discretion of the
-38-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
Tax Commissioner for succeeding periods not to exceed twelve months.
(2) The Tax Commissioner may terminate, alter, or modify any
installment agreement entered into under this section if:
(a) Information provided by the registered seller to the Tax
Commissioner prior to the date of such agreement was inaccurate or
incomplete;
(b) The registered seller fails to pay any installment at such time
the installment payment is due under such agreement;
(c) The registered seller fails to pay any other tax liability due
the Department of Revenue at the time such liability is due, unless the
registered seller has appealed such other tax liability;
(d) The financial condition of the registered seller has
significantly changed;
(e) The registered seller fails to provide a financial condition
update as requested by the Tax Commissioner; or
(f) The Tax Commissioner believes that collection of any tax to
which an agreement under this section relates is in jeopardy.
(3) The Tax Commissioner shall have sole authority and discretion to
enter into or to amend, modify, or terminate any installment payment
agreement provided for under this section. The Tax Commissioner shall
adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary for the
implementation of this section.
(4) Any county, city, or village administering its own consumption
tax shall have the same authority as provided to the Tax Commissioner by
this section relating to installment payments with respect to the
consumption tax administered by such county, city, or village.
Sec. 36. (1) All reports and report information provided to the Tax
Commissioner or the Department of Revenue pursuant to the Nebraska EPIC
Option Consumption Tax Act shall be deemed confidential, and except as
otherwise authorized in the act, no officer or employee, or former
officer or employee, of the State of Nebraska or any other person who has
-39-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
been provided access to tax information shall disclose any such
information to anyone employed outside of the Department of Revenue. Any
violation of this subsection is a Class IV felony.
(2) The Tax Commissioner or an employee of the Department of Revenue
may disclose a report or report information of a registered seller to
such registered seller, the tax matters person associated with the
registered seller, the spouse or adult child of the registered seller, or
another person authorized to represent the registered seller.
(3) The Tax Commissioner or an employee of the Department of Revenue
may disclose a report or report information of a person who is
incompetent to the trustee or guardian of such person.
(4) In the case of a deceased person, the Tax Commissioner or an
employee of the Department of Revenue may disclose a report or report
information to:
(a) The decedent's personal representative, administrator, executor,
or estate trustee;
(b) The decedent's heir at law, next of kin, or beneficiary under a
will who has a material interest that will be affected by the
information; or
(c) A person who is a joint tenant with the decedent with a right of
survivorship.
(5) The Tax Commissioner or an employee of the Department of Revenue
may disclose a person's tax report or report information to such person's
trustee in bankruptcy.
(6) The Tax Commissioner or an employee of the Department of Revenue
may disclose a person's tax report or report information in compliance
with a court order.
(7) The Tax Commissioner or an employee of the Department of Revenue
may disclose a report or report information to the Revenue Committee of
the Legislature, the Appropriations Committee of the Legislature, or the
Executive Board of the Legislative Council if such report or information
-40-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
does not identify any particular person, unless such person consents in
writing to the disclosure of such information.
(8) A person may waive the confidentiality rights provided in this
section if such waiver of rights is done in writing.
(9) Disclosure of a report or report information by officers,
agents, or employees of the Department of Revenue to other officers,
agents, or employees of the Department of Revenue in the ordinary course
of tax administration activities shall not constitute unlawful disclosure
of the report or report information.
(10) Upon request by the Governor, the Tax Commissioner shall
furnish reports and report information to such officers, agents, and
employees of the State of Nebraska as the Governor may prescribe by rule
and regulation or by executive order for the purpose of, and only to the
extent necessary for, statistical activities authorized by law.
(11) The Tax Commissioner or an employee of the Department of
Revenue may provide reports or report information for purposes of
academic research to researchers working at the University of Nebraska,
researchers working in the Nebraska state college system, researchers
working in the community college system, or researchers working in a
private college or university within the State of Nebraska if such
reports or report information does not identify any particular person.
Sec. 37. Interest on any final assessment shall accrue from the
date of entry of the final assessment on the total amount of its
components, including tax, interest, and any penalty, as one lump-sum
amount.
Sec. 38. Except as provided in subsection (3) of section 7 of this
act, nothing in the Nebraska EPIC Option Consumption Tax Act shall limit
the ability of counties, cities, or villages from imposing a separate
consumption tax within the limits of the county, city, or village.
Sec. 39. (1) Beginning in 2028, state agencies shall submit annual
budget requests for the operations of their respective state agencies to
-41-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
the Governor and to the chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of
the Legislature by September 15.
(2) A state agency's annual budget request may exceed the amount
from the prior year by the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index
for All Urban Consumers published by the federal Bureau of Labor
Statistics.
(3) Notwithstanding the limit provided in subsection (2) of this
section, in the event of an emergency where an unforeseen contingency
arises, a state agency may petition the Legislature for an increase of
such agency's budget of up to but not more than two and one-half percent.
(4) Notwithstanding the limit provided in subsection (2) of this
section, in the event of a natural disaster where the Governor has
declared the affected area as a disaster area, a state agency may
petition the Legislature for an increase of such agency's budget of up to
but not more than five percent.
(5) This section applies to both the University of Nebraska and the
Nebraska state college system. The Board of Regents of the University of
Nebraska shall submit the budget request for the University of Nebraska
as prescribed in this section. The Board of Trustees of the Nebraska
State Colleges shall submit the budget request for the Nebraska state
colleges as prescribed in this section.
(6) Nothing in this section shall preclude the Legislature from
appropriating additional funds for relief or aid from the Cash Reserve
Fund.
Sec. 40. (1) Beginning in 2028, the Governor shall submit a
comprehensive annual statewide budget to the Legislature by December 1.
The Appropriations Committee of the Legislature shall approve and submit
a bill or bills for such comprehensive annual statewide budget for
approval by the Legislature. Such bill or bills shall balance expenses
with state revenue projected by the Nebraska Economic Forecasting
Advisory Board.
-42-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
(2) Disbursement of consumption tax revenue shall be the sole
responsibility of the State Treasurer.
(3) Consumption tax revenue for each state agency shall be
administered and disbursed through the Department of Administrative
Services.
(4) Consumption tax revenue for political subdivisions shall be
administered and disbursed by the State Treasurer as provided in sections
41 to 57 of this act.
Sec. 41. For purposes of sections 41 to 47 of this act:
(1) Board means the Budget Equalization and Review Board created in
section 42 of this act;
(2) Political subdivision means any political subdivision of this
state other than a school district;
(3) Regional representative means an individual who is appointed to
the board to represent one of the five regions described in section 42 of
this act;
(4) Secretary means the Secretary of the Budget Equalization and
Review Board; and
(5) SEND score means the special expenditure needs distribution
score calculated under section 46 of this act.
Sec. 42. (1) There is hereby created the Budget Equalization and
Review Board. The purpose of the board is to ensure that all ninety-three
Nebraska counties and all political subdivisions in this state receive
adequate representation regarding funding for their operations.
(2) The board shall consist of seven members comprised of five
regional representatives, the secretary, and the Auditor of Public
Accounts or his or her designee. The five regional representatives shall
have the right to vote on all matters and shall represent the five
regions described in subsection (3) of this section. Each regional
representative shall meet all of the qualifications required for a county
commissioner. A person shall not be eligible to become a regional
-43-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
representative unless he or she has attained the age of twenty-five
years, is a registered voter, and has resided in a county within the
relevant region for a period of at least one year prior to taking office.
A regional representative shall not hold any other elected office or
serve any other governmental entity while serving as a regional
representative. The secretary shall be a nonvoting, ex officio member of
the board. The Auditor of Public Accounts or his or her designee shall
also be a nonvoting, ex officio member of the board. Regional
representatives may hire staff as needed to assist them in their work.
(3) One regional representative and one alternate shall be appointed
to represent each of the following regions:
(a) The Fort Atkinson Region, which shall include the counties of
Cass, Sarpy, Douglas, Saunders, Washington, Dodge, Colfax, Platte, Burt,
Cuming, Stanton, Madison, Thurston, Wayne, Pierce, Dakota, Dixon, and
Cedar;
(b) The St. Deroin Fort Region, which shall include the counties of
Butler, Polk, Hamilton, York, Seward, Lancaster, Otoe, Nemaha, Johnson,
Richardson, Pawnee, Gage, Saline, Fillmore, Clay, Jefferson, Thayer, and
Nuckolls;
(c) The Fort Hartsuff Region, which shall include the counties of
Keya Paha, Boyd, Knox, Antelope, Holt, Rock, Brown, Garfield, Wheeler,
Loup, Blaine, Custer, Valley, Greeley, Sherman, Howard, Boone, Nance, and
Merrick;
(d) The Fort McPherson Region, which shall include the counties of
Perkins, Lincoln, Dawes, Buffalo, Hall, Adams, Kearney, Phelps, Gosper,
Frontier, Hayes, Chase, Dundy, Hitchcock, Red Willow, Furnas, Harlan,
Franklin, and Webster; and
(e) The Fort Robinson Region, which shall include the counties of
Sioux, Scotts Bluff, Banner, Kimball, Cheyenne, Morrill, Box Butte,
Dawes, Sheridan, Cherry, Garden, Deuel, Grant, Arthur, Keith, Hooker,
Thomas, McPherson, and Logan.
-44-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
(4) Regional representatives and alternates shall be appointed in
the following manner:
(a) In June 2027, the county board of each of the eighteen counties
within the Fort Atkinson Region shall appoint a representative from their
respective county to serve on a search committee. The eighteen members of
such search committee shall appoint, by way of a majority vote, a
regional representative for the Fort Atkinson Region and an alternate,
who shall both serve four-year terms beginning on January 1, 2028. In
June 2031 and in June of every fourth year thereafter, the search
committee process shall be repeated, with each subsequent appointee
serving a four-year term beginning on January 1 of the relevant year. A
regional representative or alternate may serve two consecutive four-year
terms. Whenever a vacancy exists or whenever circumstances prevent the
regional representative from performing his or her duties, the alternate
may substitute for the regional representative or may fill the vacancy
until the next scheduled appointment;
(b) In June 2027, the county board of each of the eighteen counties
within the St. Deroin Fort Region shall appoint a representative from
their respective county to serve on a search committee. The eighteen
members of such search committee shall appoint, by way of a majority
vote, a regional representative for the St. Deroin Fort Region and an
alternate, who shall both serve two-year terms beginning on January 1,
2028. In June 2029 and in June of every fourth year thereafter, the
search committee process shall be repeated, with each subsequent
appointee serving a four-year term beginning on January 1 of the relevant
year. The initial regional representative and alternate may serve the
initial two-year term and two additional four-year terms. Each subsequent
regional representative and alternate may serve two consecutive four-year
terms. Whenever a vacancy exists or whenever circumstances prevent the
regional representative from performing his or her duties, the alternate
may substitute for the regional representative or may fill the vacancy
-45-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
until the next scheduled appointment;
(c) In June 2027, the county board of each of the nineteen counties
within the Fort Hartsuff Region shall appoint a representative from their
respective county to serve on a search committee. The nineteen members of
such search committee shall appoint, by way of a majority vote, a
regional representative for the Fort Hartsuff Region and an alternate,
who shall both serve four-year terms beginning on January 1, 2028. In
June 2031 and in June of every fourth year thereafter, the search
committee process shall be repeated, with each subsequent appointee
serving a four-year term beginning on January 1 of the relevant year. A
regional representative or alternate may serve two consecutive four-year
terms. Whenever a vacancy exists or whenever circumstances prevent the
regional representative from performing his or her duties, the alternate
may substitute for the regional representative or may fill the vacancy
until the next scheduled appointment;
(d) In June 2027, the county board of each of the nineteen counties
within the Fort McPherson Region shall appoint a representative from
their respective county to serve on a search committee. The nineteen
members of such search committee shall appoint, by way of a majority
vote, a regional representative for the Fort McPherson Region and an
alternate, who shall both serve two-year terms beginning on January 1,
2028. In June 2029 and in June of every fourth year thereafter, the
search committee process shall be repeated, with each subsequent
appointee serving a four-year term beginning on January 1 of the relevant
year. The initial regional representative and alternate may serve the
initial two-year term and two additional four-year terms. Each subsequent
regional representative and alternate may serve two consecutive four-year
terms. Whenever a vacancy exists or whenever circumstances prevent the
regional representative from performing his or her duties, the alternate
may substitute for the regional representative or may fill the vacancy
until the next scheduled appointment; and
-46-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
(e) In June 2027, the county board of each of the nineteen counties
within the Fort Robinson Region shall appoint a representative from their
respective county to serve on a search committee. The nineteen members of
such search committee shall appoint, by way of a majority vote, a
regional representative for the Fort Robinson Region and an alternate,
who shall both serve four-year terms beginning on January 1, 2028. In
June 2031 and in June of every fourth year thereafter, the search
committee process shall be repeated, with each subsequent appointee
serving a four-year term beginning on January 1 of the relevant year. A
regional representative or alternate may serve two consecutive four-year
terms. Whenever a vacancy exists or whenever circumstances prevent the
regional representative from performing his or her duties, the alternate
may substitute for the regional representative or may fill the vacancy
until the next scheduled appointment.
(5) The members of the board shall elect from among the regional
representatives a chairperson to oversee the operations of the board and
a vice-chairperson to assist the chairperson in such duties.
(6) The board shall meet at least once per quarter throughout the
calendar year, and the meetings of the board shall be subject to the Open
Meetings Act.
(7) Regional representatives shall be compensated at a rate of
eighty thousand dollars per year until changed by the Legislature.
Alternates shall be compensated at a rate of ten thousand dollars per
year, and they shall not be prohibited from working for a secondary,
nongovernmental employer. Otherwise, the requirements for an alternate
shall be the same as for a regional representative. Regional
representatives and alternates shall also be entitled to receive
reimbursement for expenses incurred incident to their service on the
board as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.
Sec. 43. (1) The Secretary of the Budget Equalization and Review
Board shall be appointed by the Governor and shall serve at the pleasure
-47-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
of the Governor. The secretary shall serve for a term of four years
beginning in the year 2028 and may be reappointed by the Governor to
serve additional terms of office. The secretary shall be a certified
public accountant.
(2) The secretary shall create a manual for preparing budgets for
use by political subdivisions. The manual shall include clear directions
for filling out and filing any required budget forms and shall be written
in consultation with the Auditor of Public Accounts and the five regional
representatives. The manual shall be approved by a majority vote of the
regional representatives. The manual shall be updated as needed, but any
changes shall be approved by a majority vote of the regional
representatives. Any proposed changes to the manual shall be reported to
the regional representatives no less than seven days prior to a vote on
such changes.
(3) The secretary shall be responsible for maintaining a website for
the board. The website shall include a concise biography of each regional
representative and the secretary. Within three calendar days after the
manual described in subsection (2) of this section has been approved, the
secretary shall make it publicly available on the website.
(4) The secretary shall advise the regional representatives on
procedures contained in the manual, but the regional representatives
shall act as the liaisons between the political subdivisions within their
respective regions and the board.
(5) The secretary shall record the minutes of any board meetings,
shall post the minutes of each board meeting on the website described in
subsection (3) of this section in a timely manner, and shall make any
such minutes available to the public.
(6) The secretary shall serve the regional representatives by
performing any additional tasks assigned to the secretary by a majority
vote of the regional representatives.
(7) The secretary shall be compensated at a rate of eighty thousand
-48-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
dollars per year until changed by the Legislature. The secretary shall
also be entitled to receive reimbursement for expenses incurred while in
the performance of his or her duties as provided in sections 81-1174 to
81-1177.
Sec. 44. The manual described in section 43 of this act shall
include the following schedule for preparing budgets:
(1) On or before the second Monday in May of each calendar year,
each county shall send in writing to each political subdivision located
or headquartered within the county a request to prepare a preliminary
budget proposal, which shall include an itemized estimate of the probable
revenue needed for the ensuing fiscal year, actual expenses for the
previous five years, a five-year average of expenses, and any requests
for additional expenditures. The request to prepare a preliminary budget
proposal shall include a thirty-day deadline for submission of such
proposal;
(2) Each county and political subdivision shall prepare a
preliminary budget proposal and shall make such preliminary budget
proposal available to the public in written or electronic form no later
than the second Monday in June. Each preliminary budget proposal shall
include an itemized estimate of probable revenue needed for the ensuing
fiscal year, actual expenses for the previous five years, a five-year
average of expenses, and any requests for additional expenditures. The
five-year average of expenses represents the maximum amount of funding
that a county or political subdivision shall receive from the state;
(3) If a preliminary budget proposal for a county or political
subdivision includes a request for additional expenditures which exceeds
the five-year average of expenses for the county or political subdivision
by more than two and one-half percent, the county or political
subdivision shall schedule a public hearing for its preliminary budget
proposal to be held between the dates of July 1 and July 30. Public
notice of the hearing shall be given ten business days prior to the date
-49-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
of the hearing. The agenda for any such public hearing shall include a
reasonable amount of time for questions and comments from the public.
Additional hearing dates may be scheduled at the discretion of the
governing body of the county or political subdivision;
(4) Each county and political subdivision shall make any necessary
changes to its preliminary budget proposal and approve the proposal by a
majority vote of the governing body of such county or political
subdivision. Political subdivisions shall submit such proposal to the
county in which the political subdivision is located or headquartered by
August 30. Each proposal shall include an itemized estimate of probable
revenue needed for the ensuing fiscal year, actual expenses for the
previous five years, a five-year average of expenses, and any requests
for additional expenditures;
(5) Each county shall prepare a countywide budget proposal which
includes the county's preliminary budget proposal along with the
preliminary budget proposals submitted by the political subdivisions
located or headquartered within the county. Under no circumstances shall
the county alter a preliminary budget proposal submitted by a political
subdivision;
(6) Each county shall submit the countywide budget proposal to the
regional representative for the county, to the secretary, and to the
Auditor of Public Accounts on or before September 15. The countywide
budget proposal shall conform to the standardized form as prescribed in
the manual and shall include the county's and each political
subdivision's itemized estimate of probable revenue needed for the
ensuing fiscal year, actual expenses for the previous five years, a five-
year average of expenses, and any requests for additional expenditures;
(7) By September 24, each regional representative shall notify each
county in his or her region and each political subdivision located or
headquartered within a county in his or her region, indicating whether
the preliminary budget proposal submitted by such county or political
-50-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
subdivision conforms to the standards described in the manual. If the
regional representative, the secretary, and the Auditor of Public
Accounts find that a preliminary budget proposal is unsatisfactory, the
county or political subdivision shall have until October 15 to correct
the proposal and submit a revised proposal to the regional
representative, the secretary, and the Auditor of Public Accounts. If the
revised budget proposal remains unsatisfactory after the October 15
deadline, the regional representative shall have authority to make any
necessary revisions to the budget proposal;
(8) Each regional representative shall make a comprehensive report
for all of the countywide budget proposals within his or her respective
region and shall submit such comprehensive report to the board for
approval no later than October 25. Each comprehensive report shall also
be posted to the website described in section 43 of this act for public
viewing by October 25. Each comprehensive report shall require a majority
vote of the regional representatives for approval before it can be
included in the statewide report described in subdivision (9) of this
section; and
(9) The secretary shall prepare a statewide report consisting of all
comprehensive reports approved under subdivision (8) of this section. The
statewide report shall be approved by a majority vote of the regional
representatives. Once approved, the secretary shall submit the statewide
report to the Governor and to the chairperson of the Appropriations
Committee of the Legislature by November 15. The secretary shall also
make the report available for public viewing on the website described in
section 43 of this act by November 15.
Sec. 45. (1) There is hereby created the County Trust Fund. The
fund shall be used to supply counties and political subdivisions with
adequate funds to run their respective operations. The Appropriations
Committee of the Legislature shall use the statewide report received
under section 44 of this act to determine the amount to be transferred
-51-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
each year to the County Trust Fund. The State Treasurer shall transfer
money to the County Trust Fund as directed by the Legislature. Any money
in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state
investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(2) Each county and political subdivision shall establish a separate
bank account for its operations and shall supply the State Treasurer with
the bank account number and routing number for such account. The State
Treasurer shall use such information to make electronic transfers from
the County Trust Fund into such bank accounts each month in a manner that
is compliant with the annual budget passed by the Legislature.
Sec. 46. (1) There is hereby created the County Stabilization Fund.
The purpose of the County Stabilization Fund is to assist counties with
additional or unexpected expenditures. The Legislature may transfer money
into the County Stabilization Fund as needed, but at no time shall the
balance of the County Stabilization Fund exceed ten percent of the total
amount transferred for the year into the County Trust Fund pursuant to
section 45 of this act. If the balance of the County Stabilization Fund
exceeds such amount, the State Treasurer shall transfer the excess to the
Cash Reserve Fund. Any money in the County Stabilization Fund available
for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant
to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
(2) The Legislature shall have sole authority to determine the
distributions to be made from the County Stabilization Fund.
Distributions from the fund shall be made annually to each county as
nonrepayable grants based on each county's SEND score. Each county's SEND
score shall be calculated by the regional representative for such county
using the method described in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) A county's SEND score shall reflect the amount that a county
needs to provide standardized quality countywide services to the
-52-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
residents of the county and shall be calculated in the following manner:
(a) A public service needs score shall be calculated. The public
service needs score measures the amount of revenue a county needs to
provide for basic public services, such as fire departments and police
departments. A complete list of public service needs shall be included in
the manual. To calculate the public service needs score, highways and
hospitals shall be excluded from the calculation. All other services
shall be included. A five-year average cost per person for such services
shall be established. The public service needs score shall be the five-
year average cost per person multiplied by the population of the county;
(b) A highway maintenance score shall be calculated. The highway
maintenance score measures the amount that a county is expected to spend
to maintain its streets, roads, and highways. A complete list of
expenditures for streets, roads, and highways shall be included in the
manual. The highway maintenance score begins by determining the average
amount spent per mile each year by the county to maintain its streets,
roads, and highways. The highway maintenance score is then calculated by
taking the average spending per mile for the previous five-year period
and multiplying that number by the number of miles of streets, roads, and
highways that the county is responsible for servicing. Streets, roads,
and highways that are under the care of a municipality or township shall
not be included in the highway maintenance score unless the county is
under contract with the municipality or township to maintain such
streets, roads, or highways;
(c) A hospital score shall be calculated. The hospital score
measures the added burden that some counties in Nebraska have for
maintaining hospitals. The hospital score begins by determining the
average amount spent per person each year by the county for maintaining
the county's hospitals. The hospital score is then calculated by taking
the average spending per person for the previous five-year period and
multiplying that number by the population of the county; and
-53-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
(d) The SEND score shall be calculated by adding together the public
service needs score, the highway maintenance score, and the hospital
score.
(4) The regional representative shall calculate and include the SEND
scores for each county in his or her region in the comprehensive report
submitted to the board under subdivision (8) of section 44 of this act,
and the secretary shall include the SEND scores in the statewide report
submitted to the Governor and the chairperson of the Appropriations
Committee of the Legislature under subdivision (9) of section 44 of this
act. The reports shall include each county's public service needs score,
highway maintenance score, hospital score, and overall SEND score. In
deciding what to fund each year, the Legislature may give preference to
counties with an unusually high public service needs score, highway
maintenance score, or hospital score. Otherwise, the Legislature shall
give preference to counties with the highest overall SEND scores, however
each county shall receive money from the County Stabilization Fund
annually.
(5) For purposes of this section, hospital means any facility that
is staffed and equipped for performing surgical procedures or for
treating and housing persons with infectious or contagious diseases.
Sec. 47. (1) There is hereby created the County Rainy Day Fund. The
purpose of the County Rainy Day Fund is to provide money to counties that
are recovering from a fire, a flood, a tornado, or any other kind of
natural disaster which destroys buildings or structures used for
governmental purposes or to renovate uninhabitable properties. No
property shall be considered uninhabitable until it has been declared
permanently uninhabitable by an inspector designated by the local public
health department or county board and has remained uninhabited for a
period of no less than one hundred eighty days. A structure may be
considered permanently uninhabitable when the structure is unstable and
is subject to collapse in part or in whole, the structure is allowing
-54-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
elemental intrusion, or an unresolved safety hazard exists within the
structure. The Legislature may transfer money into the County Rainy Day
Fund as needed, but at no time shall the balance of the County Rainy Day
Fund exceed eight percent of the total amount transferred for the year
into the County Trust Fund pursuant to section 45 of this act. If the
balance of the County Rainy Day Fund exceeds such amount, the State
Treasurer shall transfer the excess to the Cash Reserve Fund. Any money
in the County Rainy Day Fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(2) The County Rainy Day Fund shall be used solely for the purposes
of repairing structures, replacing structures, or providing for temporary
shelters or temporary structures for purposes of county, municipal, or
township government work or work associated with any political
subdivision included in the countywide budget. The Legislature shall have
sole authority for determining whether distributions should be made from
the County Rainy Day Fund, except that whenever the Legislature stands in
recess for a period of at least five calendar days following a fire,
flood, tornado, or any other kind of natural disaster and the Governor
declares a state of emergency, the Governor may by way of executive order
withdraw money from the County Rainy Day Fund to repair damaged buildings
or structures or to provide for temporary shelters or temporary
structures for purposes of county, municipal, or township work, including
any work associated with a political subdivision included in the
countywide budget. Distributions from the fund shall be made as
nonrepayable grants.
Sec. 48. For purposes of sections 48 to 57 of this act:
(1) Board means the School Equalization and Review Board created in
section 49 of this act;
(2) Regional representative means an individual who is appointed to
the board to represent one of the five regions described in section 49 of
-55-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
this act; and
(3) Secretary means the Secretary of the School Equalization and
Review Board.
Sec. 49. (1) There is hereby created the School Equalization and
Review Board. The purpose of the board is to ensure that school districts
receive adequate representation regarding funding for their operations.
(2) The board shall consist of seven members comprised of five
regional representatives, the secretary, and the Auditor of Public
Accounts or his or her designee. The five regional representatives shall
have the right to vote on all matters and shall represent the five
regions described in subsection (3) of this section. A person shall not
be eligible to become a regional representative unless he or she has
attained the age of twenty-five years, is a registered voter, and has
resided in a county within the relevant region for a period of at least
one year prior to taking office. A regional representative shall not hold
any other elected office, serve any other governmental entity, or be
actively engaged in the teaching profession while serving as a regional
representative. The secretary shall be a nonvoting, ex officio member of
the board. The Auditor of Public Accounts or his or her designee shall
also be a nonvoting, ex officio member of the board. Regional
representatives may hire staff as needed to assist them in their work.
(3) One regional representative and one alternate shall be appointed
to represent each of the following regions:
(a) The Fort Atkinson Region, which shall include the counties of
Cass, Sarpy, Douglas, Saunders, Washington, Dodge, Colfax, Platte, Burt,
Cuming, Stanton, Madison, Thurston, Wayne, Pierce, Dakota, Dixon, and
Cedar;
(b) The St. Deroin Fort Region, which shall include the counties of
Butler, Polk, Hamilton, York, Seward, Lancaster, Otoe, Nemaha, Johnson,
Richardson, Pawnee, Gage, Saline, Fillmore, Clay, Jefferson, Thayer, and
Nuckolls;
-56-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
(c) The Fort Hartsuff Region, which shall include the counties of
Keya Paha, Boyd, Knox, Antelope, Holt, Rock, Brown, Garfield, Wheeler,
Loup, Blaine, Custer, Valley, Greeley, Sherman, Howard, Boone, Nance, and
Merrick;
(d) The Fort McPherson Region, which shall include the counties of
Perkins, Lincoln, Dawes, Buffalo, Hall, Adams, Kearney, Phelps, Gosper,
Frontier, Hayes, Chase, Dundy, Hitchcock, Red Willow, Furnas, Harlan,
Franklin, and Webster; and
(e) The Fort Robinson Region, which shall include the counties of
Sioux, Scotts Bluff, Banner, Kimball, Cheyenne, Morrill, Box Butte,
Dawes, Sheridan, Cherry, Garden, Deuel, Grant, Arthur, Keith, Hooker,
Thomas, McPherson, and Logan.
(4) Regional representatives and alternates shall be appointed in
the following manner:
(a) In June 2027, the county board of each of the eighteen counties
within the Fort Atkinson Region shall appoint a representative from their
respective county to serve on a search committee. The eighteen members of
such search committee shall appoint, by way of a majority vote, a
regional representative for the Fort Atkinson Region and an alternate,
who shall both serve two-year terms beginning on January 1, 2028. In June
2029 and in June of every fourth year thereafter, the search committee
process shall be repeated, with each subsequent appointee serving a four-
year term beginning on January 1 of the relevant year. The initial
regional representative and alternate may serve the initial two-year term
and two additional four-year terms. Each subsequent regional
representative and alternate may serve two consecutive four-year terms.
Whenever a vacancy exists or whenever circumstances prevent the regional
representative from performing his or her duties, the alternate may
substitute for the regional representative or may fill the vacancy until
the next scheduled appointment;
(b) In June 2027, the county board of each of the eighteen counties
-57-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
within the St. Deroin Fort Region shall appoint a representative from
their respective county to serve on a search committee. The eighteen
members of such search committee shall appoint, by way of a majority
vote, a regional representative for the St. Deroin Fort Region and an
alternate, who shall both serve four-year terms beginning on January 1,
2028. In June 2031 and in June of every fourth year thereafter, the
search committee process shall be repeated, with each subsequent
appointee serving a four-year term beginning on January 1 of the relevant
year. A regional representative or alternate may serve two consecutive
four-year terms. Whenever a vacancy exists or whenever circumstances
prevent the regional representative from performing his or her duties,
the alternate may substitute for the regional representative or may fill
the vacancy until the next scheduled appointment;
(c) In June 2027, the county board of each of the nineteen counties
within the Fort Hartsuff Region shall appoint a representative from their
respective county to serve on a search committee. The nineteen members of
such search committee shall appoint, by way of a majority vote, a
regional representative for the Fort Hartsuff Region and an alternate,
who shall both serve two-year terms beginning on January 1, 2028. In June
2029 and in June of every fourth year thereafter, the search committee
process shall be repeated, with each subsequent appointee serving a four-
year term beginning on January 1 of the relevant year. The initial
regional representative and alternate may serve the initial two-year term
and two additional four-year terms. Each subsequent regional
representative and alternate may serve two consecutive four-year terms.
Whenever a vacancy exists or whenever circumstances prevent the regional
representative from performing his or her duties, the alternate may
substitute for the regional representative or may fill the vacancy until
the next scheduled appointment;
(d) In June 2027, the county board of each of the nineteen counties
within the Fort McPherson Region shall appoint a representative from
-58-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
their respective county to serve on a search committee. The nineteen
members of such search committee shall appoint, by way of a majority
vote, a regional representative for the Fort McPherson Region and an
alternate, who shall both serve four-year terms beginning on January 1,
2028. In June 2031 and in June of every fourth year thereafter, the
search committee process shall be repeated, with each subsequent
appointee serving a four-year term beginning on January 1 of the relevant
year. A regional representative or alternate may serve two consecutive
four-year terms. Whenever a vacancy exists or whenever circumstances
prevent the regional representative from performing his or her duties,
the alternate may substitute for the regional representative or may fill
the vacancy until the next scheduled appointment; and
(e) In June 2027, the county board of each of the nineteen counties
within the Fort Robinson Region shall appoint a representative from their
respective county to serve on a search committee. The nineteen members of
such search committee shall appoint, by way of a majority vote, a
regional representative for the Fort Robinson Region and an alternate,
who shall both serve two-year terms beginning on January 1, 2028. In June
2029 and in June of every fourth year thereafter, the search committee
process shall be repeated, with each subsequent appointee serving a four-
year term beginning on January 1 of the relevant year. The initial
regional representative and alternate may serve the initial two-year term
and two additional four-year terms. Each subsequent regional
representative and alternate may serve two consecutive four-year terms.
Whenever a vacancy exists or whenever circumstances prevent the regional
representative from performing his or her duties, the alternate may
substitute for the regional representative or may fill the vacancy until
the next scheduled appointment.
(5) The members of the board shall elect from among the regional
representatives a chairperson to oversee the operations of the board and
a vice-chairperson to assist the chairperson in such duties.
-59-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
(6) The board shall meet at least once per quarter throughout the
calendar year, and the meetings of the board shall be subject to the Open
Meetings Act.
(7) Regional representatives shall be compensated at a rate of
eighty thousand dollars per year until changed by the Legislature.
Alternates shall be compensated at a rate of ten thousand dollars per
year, and they shall not be prohibited from working for a secondary,
nongovernmental employer. Otherwise, the requirements for an alternate
shall be the same as for a regional representative. Regional
representatives and alternates shall also be entitled to receive
reimbursement for expenses incurred incident to their service on the
board as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.
Sec. 50. (1) The Secretary of the School Equalization and Review
Board shall be appointed by the Governor and shall serve at the pleasure
of the Governor. The secretary shall serve for a term of four years
beginning in the year 2028 and may be reappointed by the Governor to
serve additional terms of office. The secretary shall be a certified
public accountant or have at least four years of experience as a school
superintendent.
(2) The secretary shall create a manual for preparing budgets for
use by school districts. The manual shall include clear directions for
filling out and filing any required budget forms and shall be written in
consultation with the Auditor of Public Accounts and the five regional
representatives. The manual shall be approved by a majority vote of the
regional representatives. The manual shall be updated as needed, but any
changes shall be approved by a majority vote of the regional
representatives. Any proposed changes to the manual shall be reported to
the regional representatives no less than seven days prior to a vote on
such changes.
(3) The secretary shall be responsible for maintaining a website for
the board. The website shall include a concise biography of each regional
-60-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
representative and the secretary. Within three calendar days after the
manual described in subsection (2) of this section has been approved, the
secretary shall make it publicly available on the website.
(4) The secretary shall advise the regional representatives on
procedures contained in the manual, but the regional representatives
shall act as the liaisons between the schools within their respective
regions and the board.
(5) The secretary shall record the minutes of any board meetings,
shall post the minutes of each board meeting on the website described in
subsection (3) of this section in a timely manner, and shall make any
such minutes available to the public.
(6) The secretary shall serve the regional representatives by
performing any additional tasks assigned to the secretary by a majority
vote of the regional representatives.
(7) The secretary shall be compensated at a rate of eighty thousand
dollars per year until changed by the Legislature. The secretary shall
also be entitled to receive reimbursement for expenses incurred while in
the performance of his or her duties as provided in sections 81-1174 to
81-1177.
Sec. 51. The manual described in section 50 of this act shall
include the following schedule for preparing budgets:
(1) Each school board shall prepare an annual budget proposal by the
second Monday of June of each calendar year which shall apply to the
ensuing school year. The annual budget proposal shall include an average
per-student cost for each of the schools within the school district. The
school board shall use the number of registered students in each school
on April 30 of the current calendar year to determine the average per-
student cost for the ensuing school year. The school board shall also
include in its annual budget proposal a district-wide average per-student
cost along with any other requests for additional expenditures per
school. The annual budget proposal shall include the school district's
-61-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
budgets from the five previous years along with a five-year average. The
five-year average, plus two percent, shall represent the minimum amount
of funding that a school district shall receive from the state. The
annual budget proposal shall be made available for viewing by the public
on the school district's website no later than June 30;
(2) Each school board shall make any necessary adjustments to its
annual budget proposal and shall approve the annual budget proposal no
later than July 30 and shall post the revised budget proposal to the
school district's website no later than August 10;
(3) Upon approval of the annual budget proposal, each school board
shall submit its annual budget proposal to its regional representative,
to the secretary, and to the Auditor of Public Accounts by August 15;
(4) The regional representative for the school district, the
secretary, and the Auditor of Public Accounts shall review the school
district's budget proposal, and the regional representative shall notify
the school district whether the budget proposal conforms to the standards
as outlined in the manual by August 30. If the regional representative,
the secretary, and the Auditor of Public Accounts find that a school
district's budget proposal is unsatisfactory, the school board shall have
until September 30 to correct the proposal and submit a revised proposal
to the regional representative, the secretary, and the Auditor of Public
Accounts. If the revised budget proposal remains unsatisfactory after the
September 30 deadline, the regional representative, in consultation with
the secretary and the Auditor of Public Accounts, shall make any
necessary revisions to the budget proposal;
(5) Each regional representative shall submit a region-wide report
of all of the school districts within the representative's jurisdiction
to the board for approval. Each region-wide report shall require a
majority vote of the regional representatives for approval before it can
be included in the statewide report described in subdivision (6) of this
section; and
-62-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
(6) The secretary shall prepare a statewide report consisting of all
region-wide reports approved under subdivision (5) of this section. The
statewide report shall be approved by a majority vote of the regional
representatives. Once approved, the secretary shall submit the statewide
report to the Governor and to the chairperson of the Appropriations
Committee of the Legislature by November 15. The secretary shall also
make the report available for public viewing on the website described in
section 50 of this act by November 15.
Sec. 52. (1) There is hereby created the Education Trust Fund. The
purpose of the Education Trust Fund is to provide for the free
instruction in the common schools of this state as required under Article
VII, section 1, of the Constitution of Nebraska. In order to ensure that
all students between the ages of five and twenty-one years attending the
common schools in this state have the opportunity to receive a free
education, the Legislature shall transfer money into the Education Trust
Fund annually to cover the five-year average operational costs per school
plus two percent for all public schools operating within the state.
(2) The Appropriations Committee of the Legislature shall use the
statewide report received under section 51 of this act to determine the
amount to be transferred each year to the Education Trust Fund. The State
Treasurer shall transfer money to the Education Trust Fund as directed by
the Legislature. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(3) Each school district shall establish a separate bank account for
its operations and shall supply the State Treasurer with the bank account
number and routing number for such account. The State Treasurer shall use
such information to make electronic transfers from the Education Trust
Fund into such bank accounts each month in a manner that is compliant
with the annual budget passed by the Legislature.
Sec. 53. (1) There is hereby created the Education Stabilization
-63-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
Fund. The purpose of the Education Stabilization Fund is to ensure that
every school district receives adequate funding for its operations. The
Legislature may transfer money into the Education Stabilization Fund as
needed, but at no time shall the balance of the Education Stabilization
Fund exceed ten percent of the total amount transferred for the year into
the Education Trust Fund pursuant to section 52 of this act. If the
balance of the Education Stabilization Fund exceeds such amount, the
State Treasurer shall transfer the excess to the Cash Reserve Fund. Any
money in the Education Stabilization Fund available for investment shall
be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska
Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(2) The Legislature shall have sole authority to determine the
distributions to be made from the Education Stabilization Fund.
Distributions from the fund shall be made annually to each school
district as nonrepayable grants based on each school district's
stabilization score. Each school district's stabilization score shall be
calculated by the regional representative according to the uniform
procedure outlined by the Secretary of the School Equalization and Review
Board in the manual described in section 50 of this act. The
stabilization scores shall include the following:
(a) A special student needs score shall be calculated by adding
together the number of students with physical disabilities, the number of
special education students, the number of students with learning
disabilities, and the number of students learning English as a second
language on April 30 and dividing that number by the total number of
students enrolled in the district on April 30. If a student fits into
more than one of the categories listed in this subdivision, he or she
shall be included in the total for each such category;
(b) A transportation score shall be calculated by adding up the
total number of miles traveled by school buses and parents throughout the
school district during the month of April and dividing that number by
-64-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
thirty. The number of miles traveled by school buses and parents shall
include transportation of students to and from school, for field trips,
and for after school activities;
(c) A technology score shall be calculated by adding up the number
of computers owned by the school district on April 30 and dividing that
number by the total number of students enrolled in the district on April
30;
(d) A textbook score shall be calculated by adding up the number of
textbooks owned by the school district on April 30 and dividing that
number by the total number of students enrolled in the district on April
30;
(e) A poverty score shall be calculated by adding up the total
number of students receiving federally subsidized school lunches during
the month of April and dividing that number by the total number of
students enrolled in the school district on April 30; and
(f) The stabilization score shall be calculated by adding together
the special student needs score, the transportation score, the technology
score, the textbook score, and the poverty score.
(3) The regional representative shall include the stabilization
score for each school district within his or her jurisdiction in the
region-wide report submitted to the board under subdivision (5) of
section 51 of this act, and the Secretary of the School Equalization and
Review Board shall include the stabilization scores in the statewide
report submitted to the Governor and the chairperson of the
Appropriations Committee of the Legislature under subdivision (6) of
section 51 of this act. The reports shall include each school district's
special student needs score, transportation score, technology score,
textbook score, poverty score, and overall stabilization score. In
deciding what to fund each year, the Legislature may give preference to
school districts with an unusually high special student needs score,
transportation score, technology score, textbook score, or poverty score.
-65-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
Otherwise, the Legislature shall give preference to school districts with
the highest overall stabilization scores.
Sec. 54. (1) There is hereby created the Education Facilities and
Growth Fund. The purpose of the Education Facilities and Growth Fund is
to provide money to school districts for the construction of new
buildings and facilities, the maintenance of current buildings and
facilities, and growth promotion. The Legislature may transfer money into
the Education Facilities and Growth Fund as needed, but at no time shall
the balance of the Education Facilities and Growth Fund exceed eight
percent of the total amount transferred for the year into the Education
Trust Fund pursuant to section 52 of this act. If the balance of the
Education Facilities and Growth Fund exceeds such amount, the State
Treasurer shall transfer the excess to the Cash Reserve Fund. Any money
in the Education Facilities and Growth Fund available for investment
shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment
Act.
(2) The Education Facilities and Growth Fund shall be used solely
for the purposes of building new structures or facilities, repairing or
replacing current structures or facilities, promoting new programs,
expanding current programs, or enhancing current programs.
(3) Each regional representative shall include requests for projects
to be funded from the Education Facilities and Growth Fund each year in
the region-wide report submitted to the board pursuant to subdivision (5)
of section 51 of this act. The secretary shall include such requests in
the statewide report submitted to the Governor and the chairperson of the
Appropriations Committee of the Legislature pursuant to subdivision (6)
of section 51 of this act.
(4) The Legislature shall have sole authority for determining which
projects receive funding each year from the Education Facilities and
Growth Fund. Distributions from the fund shall be made as nonrepayable
-66-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
grants.
Sec. 55. (1) There is hereby created the School Facilities
Assessment Committee. The purpose of the committee is to assess the
conditions of the facilities belonging to Nebraska's public school
districts, develop plans for the construction of new facilities and
maintenance of existing structures, and oversee the distribution of funds
for capital projects. No later than April 30 of each calendar year, the
committee shall submit a report of the needs of public school district
facilities to the School Facilities and Growth Commission.
(2) The committee shall consist of five members who shall be
appointed by the Commissioner of Education and may be removed by the
Governor. The five members of the committee shall have the right to vote
on all matters, and one member of the committee shall reside in each of
the five regions of the School Equalization and Review Board. A member of
the committee shall not reside in the same region as another member of
the committee. The members of the committee shall follow the policies as
set forth by the School Facilities and Growth Commission. No later than
April 30 of each calendar year, the committee shall submit a report of
school districts' facilities needs to the School Facilities and Growth
Commission.
(3) The members of the committee shall elect from among the members
a chairperson to oversee the operations of the committee, a vice-
chairperson to assist the chairperson in such duties, and a secretary
responsible for keeping the minutes of the committee's meetings and
writing the report of the needs of public school district facilities.
(4) The committee shall meet at least once per quarter throughout
the calendar year, and the meetings of the committee shall be subject to
the Open Meetings Act.
(5) Members of the committee shall be compensated at a rate of sixty
thousand dollars per year until changed by the Legislature. Members of
the committee shall also be entitled to receive reimbursement for
-67-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
expenses incurred incident to their service on the committee as provided
in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.
Sec. 56. (1) There is hereby created the School Programs and Growth
Committee. The purpose of the committee is to measure the growth of
Nebraska's public school districts, assess the needs for new or expanded
programs, and oversee the distribution of funds for such new or expanded
programs. No later than April 30 of each calendar year, the committee
shall submit a report of the growth needs of public school district
facilities to the School Programs and Growth Commission.
(2) The committee shall consist of five members who shall be
appointed by the Commissioner of Education and may be removed by the
Governor. The five members shall have the right to vote on all matters,
and one member of the committee shall reside in each of the five regions
of the School Equalization and Review Board. A member of the committee
shall not reside in the same region as another member of the committee.
The members of the committee shall follow the policies as set forth by
the School Facilities and Growth Commission.
(3) The members of the committee shall elect from among the members
a chairperson to oversee the operations of the committee, a vice-
chairperson to assist the chairperson in such duties, and a secretary
responsible for keeping the minutes of the committee's meetings and
writing the report of the growth needs of public school districts.
(4) The committee shall meet at least once per quarter throughout
the calendar year, and the meetings of the committee shall be subject to
the Open Meetings Act.
(5) Members of the committee shall be compensated at a rate of sixty
thousand dollars per year until changed by the Legislature. Members of
the committee shall also be entitled to receive reimbursement for
expenses incurred incident to their service on the committee as provided
in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.
Sec. 57. (1) There is hereby created the School Facilities and
-68-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
Growth Commission. The purpose of the commission is to establish the
policies to be used for measuring the conditions of existing public
school district facilities, the procedures for assessing the need for new
structures or new facilities, the methodology for measuring public school
district growth, and the procedures for assessing the need for new or
expanded programs. The commission shall submit an annual report of
recommended capital improvement projects, new facilities, and new
programs and growth potential to the Secretary of the School Equalization
and Review Board.
(2) The commission shall consist of five members who shall be
appointed by the Governor, subject to approval by the Legislature. The
members of the commission may be removed by the Governor. The five
members of the commission shall have the right to vote on all matters,
and one member of the commission shall reside in each of the five regions
of the School Equalization and Review Board. A member of the commission
shall not reside in the same region as another member of the commission.
(3) The members of the commission shall elect from among the members
a chairperson to oversee the operations of the commission, a vice-
chairperson to assist the chairperson in such duties, and a secretary
responsible for keeping the minutes of the commission's meetings and
writing the report of recommended capital improvement projects, new
facilities, and new programs and growth potential.
(4) The commission shall meet at least once per quarter throughout
the calendar year, and the meetings of the commission shall be subject to
the Open Meetings Act.
(5) Members of the commission shall be compensated at a rate of
seventy thousand dollars per year until changed by the Legislature.
Members of the commission shall also be entitled to receive reimbursement
for expenses incurred incident to their service on the commission as
provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.
Sec. 58. Section 13-319, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-69-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
amended to read:
13-319 Any county by resolution of the governing body may impose a
sales and use tax of one-half percent, one percent, or one and one-half
percent upon the same transactions sourced as provided in sections
77-2703.01 to 77-2703.04 within the county, but outside any incorporated
municipality which has adopted a local sales tax pursuant to section
77-27,142, on which the state is authorized to impose a tax pursuant to
the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, as amended from time to time. Any sales
and use tax imposed pursuant to this section must be used (1) to finance
public safety services provided by a public safety commission, (2) to
provide the county share of funds required under any other agreement
executed under the Interlocal Cooperation Act or Joint Public Agency Act,
or (3) to finance public safety services provided by the county. A sales
and use tax shall not be imposed pursuant to this section until an
election has been held and a majority of the qualified electors have
approved the tax pursuant to sections 13-322 and 13-323. A sales and use
tax shall not be imposed pursuant to this section if the county is
imposing a tax pursuant to section 77-6403. Any sales and use tax imposed
pursuant to this section shall terminate as provided in section 3 of this
act.
Sec. 59. Section 13-501, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
13-501 (1) Sections 13-501 to 13-513 shall be known and may be cited
as the Nebraska Budget Act.
(2) The Nebraska Budget Act shall apply until January 1, 2028. On
and after such date, the budgetary process shall be governed by the
Nebraska EPIC Option Consumption Tax Act.
Sec. 60. Section 13-2813, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
13-2813 (1) A municipal county by ordinance of its council may
impose a sales and use tax of one-half percent, one percent, or one and
-70-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
one-half percent upon the same transactions within the entire municipal
county on which the state is authorized to impose a tax pursuant to the
Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, as amended from time to time.
(2) A municipal county shall not impose a new sales and use tax,
increase the tax, or extend the territory of an existing sales and use
tax until an election is held and a majority of the registered voters as
provided in section 13-2810 have approved the tax, increase, or
extension. The ballot issue proposing approval of a new sales and use tax
or the increase or territorial extension of an existing sales and use tax
may be combined with the issue proposing creation of a municipal county.
(3) Any sales and use tax imposed pursuant to this section shall
terminate as provided in section 3 of this act.
Sec. 61. Section 18-2147, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
18-2147 (1) Any redevelopment plan as originally approved or as
later modified pursuant to section 18-2117 may contain a provision that
any ad valorem tax levied upon real property, or any portion thereof, in
a redevelopment project for the benefit of any public body shall be
divided, for the applicable period described in subsection (4) of this
section, as follows:
(a) That portion of the ad valorem tax which is produced by the levy
at the rate fixed each year by or for each such public body upon the
redevelopment project valuation shall be paid into the funds of each such
public body in the same proportion as are all other taxes collected by or
for the body. When there is not a redevelopment project valuation on a
parcel or parcels, the county assessor shall determine the redevelopment
project valuation based upon the fair market valuation of the parcel or
parcels as of January 1 of the year prior to the year that the ad valorem
taxes are to be divided. The county assessor shall provide written notice
of the redevelopment project valuation to the authority as defined in
section 18-2103 and the owner. The authority or owner may protest the
-71-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
valuation to the county board of equalization within thirty days after
the date of the valuation notice. All provisions of section 77-1502
except dates for filing of a protest, the period for hearing protests,
and the date for mailing notice of the county board of equalization's
decision are applicable to any protest filed pursuant to this section.
The county board of equalization shall decide any protest filed pursuant
to this section within thirty days after the filing of the protest. The
county clerk shall mail a copy of the decision made by the county board
of equalization on protests pursuant to this section to the authority or
owner within seven days after the board's decision. Any decision of the
county board of equalization may be appealed to the Tax Equalization and
Review Commission, in accordance with section 77-5013, within thirty days
after the date of the decision;
(b) That portion of the ad valorem tax on real property, as provided
in the redevelopment contract, bond resolution, or redevelopment plan, as
applicable, in the redevelopment project in excess of such amount, if
any, shall be allocated to and, when collected, paid into a special fund
of the authority to be used solely to pay the principal of, the interest
on, and any premiums due in connection with the bonds of, loans, notes,
or advances of money to, or indebtedness incurred by, whether funded,
refunded, assumed, or otherwise, such authority for financing or
refinancing, in whole or in part, the redevelopment project. When such
bonds, loans, notes, advances of money, or indebtedness, including
interest and premiums due, have been paid, the authority shall so notify
the county assessor and county treasurer and all ad valorem taxes upon
taxable real property in such a redevelopment project shall be paid into
the funds of the respective public bodies. An authority may use a single
fund for purposes of this subdivision for all redevelopment projects or
may use a separate fund for each redevelopment project; and
(c) Any interest and penalties due for delinquent taxes shall be
paid into the funds of each public body in the same proportion as are all
-72-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
other taxes collected by or for the public body.
(2) To the extent that a redevelopment plan authorizes the division
of ad valorem taxes levied upon only a portion of the real property
included in such redevelopment plan, any improvements funded by such
division of taxes shall be related to the redevelopment plan that
authorized such division of taxes.
(3)(a) For any redevelopment plan located in a city of the
metropolitan class that includes a division of taxes, as provided in this
section, that produces, in whole or in part, funds to be used directly or
indirectly for (i) new construction, rehabilitation, or acquisition of
housing for households with annual incomes below the area median income
for households and located within six hundred yards of a public passenger
streetcar or (ii) new construction, rehabilitation, or acquisition of
single-family housing or condominium housing used as primary residences
for individuals with annual incomes below the area median income for
individuals, such housing shall be deemed related to the redevelopment
plan that authorized such division of taxes regardless of whether such
housing is or will be located on real property within such redevelopment
plan, as long as such housing supports activities occurring on or
identified in such redevelopment plan.
(b) During each fiscal year in which the funds described in
subdivision (a) of this subsection are available, the authority and city
shall make best efforts to allocate not less than thirty percent of such
funds to single-family housing deemed related to the redevelopment plan
described under such subdivision.
(c) In selecting projects to receive funding, the authority and city
shall develop a qualified allocation plan and give first priority to
financially viable projects that serve the lowest income occupants for
the longest period of time.
(4)(a) For any redevelopment plan for which more than fifty percent
of the property in the redevelopment project area has been declared an
-73-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
extremely blighted area in accordance with section 18-2101.02, ad valorem
taxes shall be divided for a period not to exceed twenty years after the
effective date as identified in the project redevelopment contract or in
the resolution of the authority authorizing the issuance of bonds
pursuant to section 18-2124.
(b) For all other redevelopment plans, ad valorem taxes shall be
divided for a period not to exceed fifteen years after the effective date
as identified in the project redevelopment contract, in the resolution of
the authority authorizing the issuance of bonds pursuant to section
18-2124, or in the redevelopment plan, whichever is applicable.
(5) The effective date of a provision dividing ad valorem taxes as
provided in subsection (4) of this section shall not occur until such
time as the real property in the redevelopment project is within the
corporate boundaries of the city. This subsection shall not apply to a
redevelopment project involving a formerly used defense site as
authorized in section 18-2123.01.
(6) Beginning August 1, 2006, all notices of the provision for
dividing ad valorem taxes shall be sent by the authority to the county
assessor on forms prescribed by the Property Tax Administrator. The
notice shall be sent to the county assessor on or before August 1 of the
year of the effective date of the provision. Failure to satisfy the
notice requirement of this section shall result in the taxes, for all
taxable years affected by the failure to give notice of the effective
date of the provision, remaining undivided and being paid into the funds
for each public body receiving property taxes generated by the property
in the redevelopment project. However, the redevelopment project
valuation for the remaining division of ad valorem taxes in accordance
with subdivisions (1)(a) and (b) of this section shall be the last
certified valuation for the taxable year prior to the effective date of
the provision to divide the taxes for the remaining portion of the
twenty-year or fifteen-year period pursuant to subsection (4) of this
-74-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
section.
(7) The division of taxes authorized in this section shall terminate
when the property tax terminates in accordance with section 4 of this
act.
Sec. 62. Section 60-3,185, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-3,185 A motor vehicle tax is imposed on motor vehicles registered
for operation upon the highways of this state, except:
(1) Motor vehicles exempt from the registration fee in section
60-3,160;
(2) One motor vehicle owned and used for his or her personal
transportation by a disabled or blind veteran of the United States Armed
Forces as defined in section 77-202.23 whose disability or blindness is
recognized by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs and who
was discharged or otherwise separated with a characterization of
honorable if an application for the exemption has been approved under
subsection (1) of section 60-3,189;
(3) Motor vehicles owned by Indians who are members of an Indian
tribe;
(4) Motor vehicles owned by a member of the United States Armed
Forces serving in this state in compliance with military or naval orders
or his or her spouse if such servicemember or spouse is a resident of a
state other than Nebraska;
(5) Motor vehicles owned by the state and its governmental
subdivisions and exempt as provided in subdivision (1)(a) or (b) of
section 77-202;
(6) Motor vehicles owned and used exclusively by an organization or
society qualified for a tax exemption provided in subdivision (1)(c) or
(d) of section 77-202 if an application for the exemption provided in
this subdivision has been approved under subsection (2) of section
60-3,189; and
-75-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
(7) Trucks, trailers, or combinations thereof registered under
section 60-3,198.
The motor vehicle tax imposed pursuant to this section shall
terminate as provided in section 4 of this act.
Sec. 63. Section 60-3,190, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-3,190 (1) A motor vehicle fee is imposed on all motor vehicles
registered for operation in this state. An owner of a motor vehicle which
is exempt from the imposition of a motor vehicle tax pursuant to section
60-3,185 shall also be exempt from the imposition of the motor vehicle
fee imposed pursuant to this section.
(2) The department shall annually determine the motor vehicle fee on
each motor vehicle registered pursuant to this section and shall cause a
notice of the amount to be delivered to the registrant. The notice shall
be combined with the notice of the motor vehicle tax required by section
60-3,186.
(3) The motor vehicle fee schedules are set out in this subsection
and subsection (4) of this section. Except for automobiles with a value
when new of less than $20,000, and for assembled, reconstructed-
designated, and replica-designated automobiles, the fee shall be
calculated by multiplying the base fee times the fraction which
corresponds to the age category of the automobile as shown in the
following table:
YEAR FRACTION
First through fifth 1.00
Sixth through tenth .70
Eleventh and over .35
(4) The base fee shall be:
(a) Automobiles, with a value when new of less than $20,000, and
assembled, reconstructed-designated, and replica-designated automobiles —
$5
-76-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
(b) Automobiles, with a value when new of $20,000 through $39,999 —
$20
(c) Automobiles, with a value when new of $40,000 or more — $30
(d) Motorcycles and autocycles — $10
(e) Recreational vehicles and cabin trailers — $10
(f) Trucks over seven tons and buses — $30
(g) Trailers other than semitrailers — $10
(h) Semitrailers — $30
(i) Former military vehicles — $10
(j) Minitrucks — $10
(k) Low-speed vehicles — $10.
(5) The motor vehicle tax, motor vehicle fee, and registration fee
shall be paid to the county treasurer prior to the registration of the
motor vehicle for the following registration period. After retaining one
percent of the motor vehicle fee collected for costs, the remaining
proceeds shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Motor
Vehicle Fee Fund. The State Treasurer shall return funds from the Motor
Vehicle Fee Fund remitted by a county treasurer which are needed for
refunds or credits authorized by law.
(6)(a) The Motor Vehicle Fee Fund is created. On or before the last
day of each calendar quarter, the State Treasurer shall distribute all
funds in the Motor Vehicle Fee Fund as follows: (i) Fifty percent to the
county treasurer of each county, amounts in the same proportion as the
most recent allocation received by each county from the Highway
Allocation Fund; and (ii) fifty percent to the treasurer of each
municipality, amounts in the same proportion as the most recent
allocation received by each municipality from the Highway Allocation
Fund. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by
the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion
Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(b) Funds from the Motor Vehicle Fee Fund shall be considered local
-77-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
revenue available for matching state sources.
(c) All receipts by counties and municipalities from the Motor
Vehicle Fee Fund shall be used for road, bridge, and street purposes.
(7) For purposes of subdivisions (4)(a), (b), (c), and (f) of this
section, automobiles or trucks includes all trucks and combinations of
trucks or truck-tractors, except those trucks, trailers, or semitrailers
registered under section 60-3,198, and the fee is based on the gross
vehicle weight rating as reported by the manufacturer.
(8) Current model year vehicles are designated as first-year motor
vehicles for purposes of the schedules.
(9) When a motor vehicle is registered which is newer than the
current model year by the manufacturer's designation, the motor vehicle
is subject to the initial motor vehicle fee for six registration periods.
(10) Assembled vehicles other than assembled, reconstructed-
designated, or replica-designated automobiles shall follow the schedules
for the motor vehicle body type.
(11) The motor vehicle fee imposed pursuant to this section shall
terminate as provided in section 4 of this act.
Sec. 64. Section 77-201, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-201 (1) Except as provided in subsections (2) through (4) of this
section, all real property in this state, not expressly exempt therefrom,
shall be subject to taxation and shall be valued at its actual value.
(2) Agricultural land and horticultural land as defined in section
77-1359 shall constitute a separate and distinct class of property for
purposes of property taxation, shall be subject to taxation, unless
expressly exempt from taxation, and shall be valued at seventy-five
percent of its actual value, except that for school district taxes levied
to pay the principal and interest on bonds that are approved by a vote of
the people on or after January 1, 2022, such land shall be valued at
fifty percent of its actual value.
-78-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
(3) Agricultural land and horticultural land actively devoted to
agricultural or horticultural purposes which has value for purposes other
than agricultural or horticultural uses and which meets the
qualifications for special valuation under section 77-1344 shall
constitute a separate and distinct class of property for purposes of
property taxation, shall be subject to taxation, and shall be valued for
taxation at seventy-five percent of its special valuation as defined in
section 77-1343, except that for school district taxes levied to pay the
principal and interest on bonds that are approved by a vote of the people
on or after January 1, 2022, such land shall be valued at fifty percent
of its special valuation as defined in section 77-1343.
(4) Historically significant real property which meets the
qualifications for historic rehabilitation valuation under sections
77-1385 to 77-1394 shall be valued for taxation as provided in such
sections.
(5) Tangible personal property, not including motor vehicles,
trailers, and semitrailers registered for operation on the highways of
this state, shall constitute a separate and distinct class of property
for purposes of property taxation, shall be subject to taxation, unless
expressly exempt from taxation, and shall be valued at its net book
value. Tangible personal property transferred as a gift or devise or as
part of a transaction which is not a purchase shall be subject to
taxation based upon the date the property was acquired by the previous
owner and at the previous owner's Nebraska adjusted basis. Tangible
personal property acquired as replacement property for converted property
shall be subject to taxation based upon the date the converted property
was acquired and at the Nebraska adjusted basis of the converted property
unless insurance proceeds are payable by reason of the conversion. For
purposes of this subsection, (a) converted property means tangible
personal property which is compulsorily or involuntarily converted as a
result of its destruction in whole or in part, theft, seizure,
-79-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
requisition, or condemnation, or the threat or imminence thereof, and no
gain or loss is recognized for federal or state income tax purposes by
the holder of the property as a result of the conversion and (b)
replacement property means tangible personal property acquired within two
years after the close of the calendar year in which tangible personal
property was converted and which is, except for date of construction or
manufacture, substantially the same as the converted property.
(6) The property tax imposed pursuant to Chapter 77 shall terminate
as provided in section 4 of this act.
Sec. 65. Section 77-2004, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-2004 (1) In the case of a father, mother, grandfather,
grandmother, brother, sister, son, daughter, child or children legally
adopted as such in conformity with the laws of the state where adopted,
any lineal descendant, any lineal descendant legally adopted as such in
conformity with the laws of the state where adopted, any person to whom
the deceased for not less than ten years prior to death stood in the
acknowledged relation of a parent, or the spouse or surviving spouse of
any such persons, the rate of tax shall be:
(a) For decedents dying prior to January 1, 2023, one percent of the
clear market value of the property received by each person in excess of
forty thousand dollars; and
(b) For decedents dying on or after January 1, 2023, one percent of
the clear market value of the property received by each person in excess
of one hundred thousand dollars.
(2) Any interest in property, including any interest acquired in the
manner set forth in section 77-2002, which may be valued at a sum less
than or equal to the applicable exempt amount under subsection (1) of
this section shall not be subject to tax. In addition the homestead
allowance, exempt property, and family maintenance allowance shall not be
subject to tax. Interests passing to the surviving spouse by will, in the
-80-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
manner set forth in section 77-2002, or in any other manner shall not be
subject to tax. Any interest passing to a person described in subsection
(1) of this section who is under twenty-two years of age shall not be
subject to tax.
(3) The tax imposed pursuant to this section shall terminate as
provided in section 5 of this act.
Sec. 66. Section 77-2005, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-2005 (1) In the case of an uncle, aunt, niece, or nephew related
to the deceased by blood or legal adoption, or other lineal descendant of
the same, or the spouse or surviving spouse of any of such persons, the
rate of tax shall be:
(a) For decedents dying prior to January 1, 2023, thirteen percent
of the clear market value of the property received by each person in
excess of fifteen thousand dollars; and
(b) For decedents dying on or after January 1, 2023, eleven percent
of the clear market value of the property received by each person in
excess of forty thousand dollars.
(2) If the clear market value of the beneficial interest is less
than or equal to the applicable exempt amount under subsection (1) of
this section, it shall not be subject to tax. In addition, any interest
passing to a person described in subsection (1) of this section who is
under twenty-two years of age shall not be subject to tax.
(3) The tax imposed pursuant to this section shall terminate as
provided in section 5 of this act.
Sec. 67. Section 77-2006, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-2006 (1) In all other cases the rate of tax shall be:
(a) For decedents dying prior to January 1, 2023, eighteen percent
of the clear market value of the beneficial interests received by each
person in excess of ten thousand dollars; and
-81-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
(b) For decedents dying on or after January 1, 2023, fifteen percent
of the clear market value of the beneficial interests received by each
person in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars.
(2) If the clear market value of the beneficial interest is less
than or equal to the applicable exempt amount under subsection (1) of
this section, it shall not be subject to any tax. In addition, any
interest passing to a person who is under twenty-two years of age shall
not be subject to tax.
(3) The tax imposed pursuant to this section shall terminate as
provided in section 5 of this act.
Sec. 68. Section 77-2701, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-2701 (1) Sections 77-2701 to 77-27,135.01, 77-27,222, 77-27,235,
77-27,236, and 77-27,238 to 77-27,242 shall be known and may be cited as
the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967.
(2) The sales and use tax and the income tax imposed pursuant to the
Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 shall terminate as provided in section 3 of
this act.
Sec. 69. Section 77-27,148, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-27,148 (1) Sections 77-27,142 to 77-27,148 may be cited as the
Local Option Revenue Act.
(2) Any sales and use tax imposed pursuant to the Local Option
Revenue Act shall terminate as provided in section 3 of this act.
Sec. 70. Section 77-3506, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-3506 (1) All homesteads in this state shall be assessed for
taxation the same as other property, except that there shall be exempt
from taxation, on any homestead described in subsection (2) of this
section, one hundred percent of the exempt amount.
(2) The exemption described in subsection (1) of this section shall
-82-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
apply to homesteads of:
(a) A veteran who was discharged or otherwise separated with a
characterization of honorable or general (under honorable conditions),
who is drawing compensation from the United States Department of Veterans
Affairs because of one hundred percent service-connected permanent
disability, and who is not eligible for total exemption under sections
77-3526 to 77-3528;
(b) An unremarried surviving spouse of a veteran described in
subdivision (2)(a) of this section or a surviving spouse of such a
veteran who remarries after attaining the age of fifty-seven years;
(c) A veteran who was discharged or otherwise separated with a
characterization of honorable or general (under honorable conditions),
who is drawing compensation from the United States Department of Veterans
Affairs because of one hundred percent service-connected temporary
disability, and who is not eligible for total exemption under sections
77-3526 to 77-3528, an unremarried spouse of such a veteran, or a
surviving spouse of such a veteran who remarries after attaining the age
of fifty-seven years;
(d) An unremarried surviving spouse of any veteran, including a
veteran other than a veteran described in section 80-401.01, who was
discharged or otherwise separated with a characterization of honorable or
general (under honorable conditions) and who died because of a service-
connected disability or a surviving spouse of such a veteran who
remarries after attaining the age of fifty-seven years;
(e) An unremarried surviving spouse of a serviceman or servicewoman,
including a veteran other than a veteran described in section 80-401.01,
whose death while on active duty was service-connected or a surviving
spouse of such a serviceman or servicewoman who remarries after attaining
the age of fifty-seven years; and
(f) An unremarried surviving spouse of a serviceman or servicewoman
who died while on active duty during the periods described in section
-83-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
80-401.01 or a surviving spouse of such a serviceman or servicewoman who
remarries after attaining the age of fifty-seven years.
(3) Application for exemption under subdivision (2)(a) of this
section shall be required in every subsequent year evenly divisible by
five and shall include certification of the status described in
subdivision (2)(a) of this section from the United States Department of
Veterans Affairs. Application for exemption under subdivision (2)(b),
(c), (d), (e), or (f) of this section shall be required annually and
shall include certification of the status described in subdivision (2)
(b), (c), (d), (e), or (f) of this section from the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs, except that such certification of status
shall only be required in every subsequent year evenly divisible by five.
(4) The exemption provided in this section shall only apply with
respect to years in which a property tax is imposed. The exemption shall
terminate when the property tax terminates in accordance with section 4
of this act.
Sec. 71. Section 77-3507, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-3507 (1) All homesteads in this state shall be assessed for
taxation the same as other property, except that there shall be exempt
from taxation on homesteads of qualified claimants a percentage of the
exempt amount as limited by section 77-3506.03. The percentage of the
exempt amount shall be determined based on the household income of a
claimant pursuant to subsections (2) through (4) of this section.
(2) For 2014, for a qualified married or closely related claimant,
the percentage of the exempt amount for which the claimant shall be
eligible shall be the percentage in Column B which corresponds with the
claimant's household income in Column A in the table found in this
subsection.
Column A Column B
Household Income Percentage
-84-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
In Dollars Of Relief
0 through 31,600 100
31,601 through 33,300 90
33,301 through 35,000 80
35,001 through 36,700 70
36,701 through 38,400 60
38,401 through 40,100 50
40,101 through 41,800 40
41,801 through 43,500 30
43,501 through 45,200 20
45,201 through 46,900 10
46,901 and over 0
(3) For 2014, for a qualified single claimant, the percentage of the
exempt amount for which the claimant shall be eligible shall be the
percentage in Column B which corresponds with the claimant's household
income in Column A in the table found in this subsection.
Column A Column B
Household Income Percentage
In Dollars Of Relief
0 through 26,900 100
26,901 through 28,300 90
28,301 through 29,700 80
29,701 through 31,100 70
31,101 through 32,500 60
32,501 through 33,900 50
33,901 through 35,300 40
35,301 through 36,700 30
36,701 through 38,100 20
38,101 through 39,500 10
39,501 and over 0
-85-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
(4) For exemption applications filed in calendar years 2015 through
2017, the income eligibility amounts in subsections (2) and (3) of this
section shall be adjusted by the percentage determined pursuant to the
provisions of section 1(f) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as it
existed prior to December 22, 2017. For exemption applications filed in
calendar year 2018 and each calendar year thereafter, the income
eligibility amounts in subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall be
adjusted by the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for All
Urban Consumers published by the federal Bureau of Labor Statistics from
the twelve months ending on August 31, 2016, to the twelve months ending
on August 31 of the year preceding the applicable calendar year. The
income eligibility amounts shall be adjusted for cumulative inflation
since 2014. If any amount is not a multiple of one hundred dollars, the
amount shall be rounded to the next lower multiple of one hundred
dollars.
(5) The exemption provided in this section shall only apply with
respect to years in which a property tax is imposed. The exemption shall
terminate when the property tax terminates in accordance with section 4
of this act.
Sec. 72. Section 77-3508, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-3508 (1)(a) All homesteads in this state shall be assessed for
taxation the same as other property, except that there shall be exempt
from taxation, on any homestead described in subdivision (b) of this
subsection, a percentage of the exempt amount as limited by section
77-3506.03. The exemption shall be based on the household income of a
claimant pursuant to subsections (2) through (4) of this section.
(b) The exemption described in subdivision (a) of this subsection
shall apply to homesteads of:
(i) Veterans as defined in section 80-401.01 who were discharged or
otherwise separated with a characterization of honorable or general
-86-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
(under honorable conditions) and who are totally disabled by a non-
service-connected accident or illness;
(ii) Individuals who have a permanent physical disability and have
lost all mobility so as to preclude locomotion without the use of a
mechanical aid or a prosthetic device as defined in section 77-2704.09;
(iii) Individuals who have undergone amputation of both arms above
the elbow or who have a permanent partial disability of both arms in
excess of seventy-five percent; and
(iv) Beginning January 1, 2015, individuals who have a developmental
disability as defined in section 83-1205.
(c) Application for the exemption described in subdivision (a) of
this subsection shall include certification from a qualified medical
physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse for
subdivisions (b)(i) through (b)(iii) of this subsection, certification
from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs affirming that the
homeowner is totally disabled due to non-service-connected accident or
illness for subdivision (b)(i) of this subsection, or certification from
the Department of Health and Human Services for subdivision (b)(iv) of
this subsection. Such certification from a qualified medical physician,
physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse or from the
Department of Health and Human Services shall be made on forms prescribed
by the Department of Revenue. If an individual described in subdivision
(b)(i), (ii), (iii), or (iv) of this subsection is granted a homestead
exemption pursuant to this section for any year, such individual shall
not be required to submit the certification required under this
subdivision in succeeding years if no change in medical condition has
occurred, except that the county assessor or the Tax Commissioner may
request such certification to verify that no change in medical condition
has occurred.
(2) For 2014, for a married or closely related claimant as described
in subsection (1) of this section, the percentage of the exempt amount
-87-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
for which the claimant shall be eligible shall be the percentage in
Column B which corresponds with the claimant's household income in Column
A in the table found in this subsection.
Column A Column B
Household Income Percentage
In Dollars Of Relief
0 through 34,700 100
34,701 through 36,400 90
36,401 through 38,100 80
38,101 through 39,800 70
39,801 through 41,500 60
41,501 through 43,200 50
43,201 through 44,900 40
44,901 through 46,600 30
46,601 through 48,300 20
48,301 through 50,000 10
50,001 and over 0
(3) For 2014, for a single claimant as described in subsection (1)
of this section, the percentage of the exempt amount for which the
claimant shall be eligible shall be the percentage in Column B which
corresponds with the claimant's household income in Column A in the table
found in this subsection.
Column A Column B
Household Income Percentage
In Dollars Of Relief
0 through 30,300 100
30,301 through 31,700 90
31,701 through 33,100 80
33,101 through 34,500 70
34,501 through 35,900 60
-88-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
35,901 through 37,300 50
37,301 through 38,700 40
38,701 through 40,100 30
40,101 through 41,500 20
41,501 through 42,900 10
42,901 and over 0
(4) For exemption applications filed in calendar years 2015 through
2017, the income eligibility amounts in subsections (2) and (3) of this
section shall be adjusted by the percentage determined pursuant to the
provisions of section 1(f) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as it
existed prior to December 22, 2017. For exemption applications filed in
calendar year 2018 and each calendar year thereafter, the income
eligibility amounts in subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall be
adjusted by the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for All
Urban Consumers published by the federal Bureau of Labor Statistics from
the twelve months ending on August 31, 2016, to the twelve months ending
on August 31 of the year preceding the applicable calendar year. The
income eligibility amounts shall be adjusted for cumulative inflation
since 2014. If any amount is not a multiple of one hundred dollars, the
amount shall be rounded to the next lower multiple of one hundred
dollars.
(5) The exemption provided in this section shall only apply with
respect to years in which a property tax is imposed. The exemption shall
terminate when the property tax terminates in accordance with section 4
of this act.
Sec. 73. Section 77-6406, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-6406 Any sales and use tax imposed pursuant to the The Qualified
Judgment Payment Act shall terminate as provided in section 3 of this act
terminates on January 1, 2027.
Sec. 74. Section 77-6827, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
-89-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
2024, is amended to read:
77-6827 (1) In order to utilize the incentives allowed in the
ImagiNE Nebraska Act, the taxpayer shall file an application with the
director, on a form developed by the director, requesting an agreement.
(2) The application shall:
(a) Identify the taxpayer applying for incentives;
(b) Identify all locations sought to be within the agreement and the
reason each such location constitutes or is expected to constitute a
qualified location;
(c) State the estimated, projected amount of new investment and the
estimated, projected number of new employees;
(d) Identify the required levels of employment and investment for
the various incentives listed within section 77-6831 that will govern the
agreement. The taxpayer may identify different levels of employment and
investment until the first December 31 following the end of the ramp-up
period on a form approved by the director. The identified levels of
employment and investment will govern all years covered under the
agreement;
(e) Identify whether the agreement is for a single qualified
location, all qualified locations within a county, all qualified
locations in more than one county, or all qualified locations within the
state;
(f) Acknowledge that the taxpayer understands the requirements for
offering health coverage, and for reporting the value of such coverage,
as specified in the ImagiNE Nebraska Act;
(g) Acknowledge that the taxpayer does not violate any state or
federal law against discrimination;
(h) Acknowledge that the taxpayer understands the requirements for
providing a sufficient package of benefits to its employees as specified
in the ImagiNE Nebraska Act; and
(i) Contain a nonrefundable application fee of five thousand
-90-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
dollars. The fee shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to
the Nebraska Incentives Fund.
(3) An application must be complete to establish the date of the
application. An application shall be considered complete once it contains
the items listed in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) Once satisfied that the application is consistent with the
purposes stated in the ImagiNE Nebraska Act for one or more qualified
locations within this state, the director shall approve the application,
subject to the base authority limitations provided in section 77-6839.
(5) The director shall make his or her determination to approve or
not approve an application within ninety days after the date of the
application. If the director requests, by mail or by electronic means,
additional information or clarification from the taxpayer in order to
make his or her determination, such ninety-day period shall be tolled
from the time the director makes the request to the time he or she
receives the requested information or clarification from the taxpayer.
The taxpayer and the director may also agree to extend the ninety-day
period. If the director fails to make his or her determination within the
prescribed ninety-day period, the application is deemed approved, subject
to the base authority limitations provided in section 77-6839.
(6) There shall be no new applications for incentives filed under
this section after the effective date of this act December 31, 2030. All
complete applications filed on or before the effective date of this act
December 31, 2030, shall be considered by the director and approved if
the location or locations and taxpayer qualify for benefits, subject to
the base authority limitations provided in section 77-6839. Agreements
may be executed with regard to complete applications filed on or before
the effective date of this act December 31, 2030. All agreements pending,
approved, or entered into before such date shall continue in full force
and effect.
(7) The State Treasurer shall pay any taxpayer entitled to credits
-91-

LB331 LB331
2025 2025
under the ImagiNE Nebraska Act that are unused on January 1, 2028, an
annual payment equal to ten percent of such credits on November 15 of
each year for ten years.
Sec. 75. Section 79-1001, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1001 (1) Sections 79-1001 to 79-1033 shall be known and may be
cited as the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act.
(2) The Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act shall
apply until January 1, 2028. On and after such date, funding for the
public schools shall be governed by the Nebraska EPIC Option Consumption
Tax Act.
Sec. 76. Section 85-2231, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
85-2231 (1) Sections 85-2231 to 85-2238 shall be known and may be
cited as the Community College Aid Act.
(2) The Community College Aid Act shall apply until January 1, 2028.
On and after such date, community colleges shall be funded as provided in
the Nebraska EPIC Option Consumption Tax Act.
Sec. 77. Original sections 13-319, 13-501, 13-2813, 60-3,185,
60-3,190, 77-27,148, 77-3507, 79-1001, and 85-2231, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 18-2147, 77-201, 77-2004, 77-2005,
77-2006, 77-2701, 77-3506, 77-3508, 77-6406, and 77-6827, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-92-